Eggs, Ameraucana Heritage
It’s that time of year when they sprout all over the place. I watch my neighbor on hands and knees in the front yard pulling them up and cursing while she does it. An avid gardener, this neighbor has sworn them as her enemy. I know that I am supposed to hate them, and as a homeowner, one whose lawn is cruising to the win the Whitetrash Yard award, I can almost muster up mild dislike. But as a photographer? That burst of sunny yellow against fresh grass green? Little seeds blowing around on a breeze? I can’t help but like dandelions. Oh, the photo-ops they provide!
#22 hot water
According to Ms. Martin, they decided to create a sea turtle mosaic and to adopt two sea turtles. Students track the turtles’ whereabouts through www.cccturtles.org.
It was dense, heavy and wrapped in foil.
2 replace
Booster cables
3 cups turbinado cane sugar
That’s okay. I’m doing it out of a sense of love, caring, understanding, friendship, brotherhood and sisterhood, those kinds of things. Plus, I’m doing it for a good old friend who — I’ll admit it here — I pretty much owe my life to from many years ago, but that’s a whole other story that could be and is told in book form.
The schools could use the help. Last year, the school district went through a funding crisis. Teachers were laid off and programs were cut. The schools need help from the community, and the Raiders are stepping up.
This is my bedroom - it happens to be in the middle of the lounge, and I guess I have to share it with my mum. She can come in and visit every once in a while.
You can purchase Elemental Styles on Whitney's Etsy shop. There are a few polishes listed now, but not these two. Keep your eyes open for Whitney to add more.. You won't regret buying these beauties!! :)
Turns out, what I want to enjoy now is hot wraps.
The Opening Day Stars cards are freakin' sweet. I've wanted that Cut from the Same Cloth card for a really long time. Now I need another one.
People are in my way. Stopping me from thinking, there’s something i need to do but they’re distracting me.
Power from beyond the manifestation.
Both the NOAA and Nasa have stated that the first six months of this year were the hottest on record, while the Met Office believes it is the second hottest start to the year after 1998.
The Templar fiction list continues strong after the success of H./M.Castor's VIII, with a debut by Claire McFall called Ferryman, the first of three unrelated titles. McFall is a young Glaswegian teacher and her book is a romance set in the afterlife of the girl victim of a road accident, who falls for the man who comes to ferry her across to the other side. Should do well!
6. Know that you’ll likely have to use the bathroom quite a bit in the next 48 hours, though your stool should be well-formed, not loose. And since the meal plan doesn’t severely limit your caloric intake, you shouldn’t feel tired or weak.
The lighter tones of pink and cream are making themselves known right now. And look- textiles! I feel as if the Spring is already inside me, the weather just needs to catch up. Unusual for me- usually I hang on to the winter as much as I can. I guess I'm just sick of sitting still. Plus I have plans brewing.
* "So Who Gives Copyright Advice to the Copyright Lawyer?", here. Never one to worry about trivia, Neil shares his latest anxiety with the Kats' sympathetic readership.
Brian Dennehy, playing the villain Sheriff Cobb, had just appeared as a kind alien in the film “Cocoon” prior to the release of Silverado.
Mocality’s sting operation
Beer and Peace
I’m not alone in saying this. Social workers have voiced a lot of perplexity with the professional distortions that have resulted from students’ strong drift toward using social work as a way to get psychologists’ credentials on the cheap. Not that I blame students for wanting to do that; I have had some of those same thoughts and plans myself. But we don’t let engineering students tell the faculty what engineering really is, and I’m not sure that social work should be completely different in that regard. (If you want documentation for this paragraph’s claim that a number of social work academics have expressed dismay at the distortions resulting from this mental health preoccupation within the profession, stick around. I’ll either come back here and add the citations, next time I stumble across them, or my next article will be published, sometime this coming winter. I’m pretty sure that that article and/or the one I published in 2008 do document some such expressions of dismay. I just don’t have time to investigate it right now. Right now, this post is something of a distraction from — more accurately, a footnote to — a different issue I want to get back to.)
The original first publication of Laws of Media, as an essay in a German magazine. This is an extremely rare item, and not well known.
The folks at Groovy Girls noticed how many comments I got on THIS POST about them, (if you missed my first review about Groovy Girls RSVP dolls, go back and click that link) so they've given me 2 more sets to give away! These dolls are really cute! I love that they're more wholesome than a lot of other dolls out there. These don't have Tammy Faye-like make-up and nightclub clothes. They've got cute hair and stylish clothes. In fact, you can even get more outfits for them (sold separately) if you like changing their clothes.
Trying to pretend the 2 was not there,
The liberal elites — mainline churches, universities, elements of the media, labor leaders — have been complicit in these sad developments. Unable to ameliorate the naked self-interest of financial and corporate elites, they have clung to their own small privileges while no longer serving a useful role. They simply do not deliver for the broad population as they used to do, and in failing to do so they have become despised by many in the working and middle classes. As Chris Hedges puts it,
For my giveaway, she is generously offering FREE Medium sized ad space ($10 value) on her blog for the month of June! FREE AD SPACE, people! You definitely want this. She's got a great blog and you will get LOTS of exposure.
means to propel balls interchangeably at different speeds and rotational velocities to different locations;
Although we'll certainly have many more things to share about Jacob, I sense a decrescendo when it comes to this blog. I don't think we'll remove it for good, but we may put it on pause for a while... This has been a beautiful place for us to share our experience with family and friends and a therapeutic place for us to just organize our thoughts and our feelings! I wish we'd started doing this sooner, but I'm so thankful that we did what we did. I'm looking into getting our blog done in print... what a great keepsake for us and for Jacob!
“We are in the process of assessing the cost of damage to the five SUVs, four cars, two motorcycles and a van,” he said.
I could reproduce the book from 1991 now because I have a printed copy. I had an electronic publishing business in the 1990s. Nothing we published can be read on modern technology, even though it was distributed on CD-ROMs. It was a proprietory format (like Kindle is). This doesn't bother me - the need for those books has passed. But it's a salutary warning.
Let me begin by saying to all the people out there who are about to sit for placements at the insti that money should be the least of your concerns when you sit for it. Yes, I am going to the IIM. And yes, I might end up applying to some of these companies. I am human, right! But I sure as hell won’t be joining a company for the money and would not stay in it for the long haul. I have worked in a pseudo investment banking setup for almost two years now, a place where a lot of money is offered to do a job that anybody who has studied 10th standard math would be proficient at doing. Very importantly, find out about the job they are offering and figure out first of all whether you will be a good fit for the job. I was very good at my job (atleast I would like to think so) and have learnt a lot in the meantime. But had i known how this would turn out to be, I would have traded it to develop a more hands on skillset. Anyway, in this little journey of mine I was at a place where job approval ratings would not have crossed single digits.
The run-into-a-red-wall-of-chopsticks thing!
iHaveADream Creations.
We went home that evening and first went out to eat, mainly due to exhaustion of being in the heat wave all day, then Hardscape set up our new grill.
By Marvin Caldwell-Barr
- one 6 oz. serving of raspberry yogurt (10:30 am)
Let us all join in this united legion, in this tsunami of change. Yes, it is the universal law, but let us also say, change does not equal chaos. It does not need to. It does need to result in you feeling displaced. Lift it up and put in a better place — yes, that is important for all of you — but not displaced, and certainly never endangered. The Mother’s plan of unfoldment does not include endangering those she cherishes.
A couple of years ago, Justice Antonin Scalia, concurring in a Supreme Court death penalty decision, took stock of the American criminal justice system and pronounced himself satisfied. The rate at which innocent people are convicted of felonies is, he said, less than three-hundredths of 1 percent — .027 percent, to be exact.
Today: I'm going on a shopping diet and I'm going to explain my plan to you.
The reason why so many are in the wilderness and never get out…is because they never get past themselves. Their focus is all about them and not about God. Usually…God gets the blame for our wilderness expereince because we don’t embrace the importance of our time in the wilderness. If you find yourself in the wilderness look for the temptations and how you can glorify God by how you respond. How you respond in faith, glory and trust will determine your next level of supernatural promotion.
1:15 - Go for walk
I worked with a woman over a decade ago who lived and breathed yoga. I thought she was nuts.
As someone who has created 200 plus companies, the lesson that can be learnt is that within IT we need to spot opportunities for improvement. It is not enough, however, just to spot them, the onus is to spot them and then to create an environment to leverage that opportunity and to make it happen.
RUNAWAY GIRL is Carissa’s story, the tale of a girl who lost herself and survived, against all odds, through the generosity of strangers. It is an inspiring true story about finding the courage to run toward healing and summoning the strength to light the way for others.
I was important in the life of a child.
More and more I am realising Christianity is not an academic exercise, you don’t dissect all the pieces …it’s called FAITH. But then where do we stand with understanding?Are we called to walk blindly?Does the inquisitive mind have to subdue itself? Proverbs 2 tells me otherwise
I would have to say my favorite gift of when I was little was my Barbie Kitchen set. It was just awesome! I had tons of Barbie's and all of her accessories, kitchen, fashion show, football stadium, cars, trucks, etc. We played for days with everything set up in my neighbors shed in her backyard that was empty except for all our Barbie stuff. Years ago my sister sold all my Barbie "stuff" to an antique dealer and I bought an Emerald & Diamond ring with the money. So every time I wear it I think of my days of playing with Barbie for hours on end.
Martha is a brilliantly written character: easy to relate to and well-rounded. What's impressive and effective about this debut is that the other characters are also efficiently drawn and clearly differentiated. Martha and her brother are good kids, shown through their concern for their mother and for Opal. Opal, of course, steals the show with her enormous personality and all-round craziness. Violet eyes? Silver hair? Lack of regard for rules and authority? How could we fail to fall for her?
I know not all of us are married. Maybe we're married and we don't have the marriage we would like. Maybe we hope to be married again or to meet "the one" or maybe we love the single life. Despite where we are in our relationships, I know we all have people we love. Hearing Polly's joy and perspective, and hearing her tell funny stories after being in so much emotional pain through the years, makes me realize that, despite the intense hurt we may feel at times, the sun really will come out tomorrow.
Sea water will decline once more.
Today's date is 2012012, crazy huh? Tonight's feature is pretty wild too, the Boris Karloff classic, "Night Key," and just like this great title card, it's simple, but very effective!
And, if you ignore my advice, you could possibly be in for the most marvelous, expensive, frustrating, troublesome, time-consuming, joyous experience of your life. But, don't say I didn't warn you.
Hubby: Okay, but can it wait just a little while? I’ve got a draft (insert appropriate fantasy league time of year here) in ten minutes.
This was shot with a lot better front light than the others, which were backlit. It needed less touch up, but
11. Television Politician
This interview with respected writer/media practitioner Julie Yap-Daza about her new book, “Mistresses Play, Men Stray, The Wives Stay,” is objective and full of insights about the Filipino culture in particular. It takes on the issue of mistresses in a Philippine context and I can say that it discussion was right on target.
another life form.
My Lovelies have created some beautiful projects for you today. I think you'll agree, once you see what I'm talking about.
"Does the sky look purple to you?"
Hold me tight and love and loving's free
This was the line that drew me in on the MTM website: “…why women are choosing Islam in today’s modern world.” I have a complicated relationship with my born-into religion and choice was never a big part of it, so I was intrigued by the notion of “choosing Islam.”
22. 1 x 8 + 1 = 9; 12 x 8 + 2 = 98; 123 x 8 + 3 = 987; 1234 x 8 + 4 = 9876; 12345 x 8 + 5 = 98765; 123456 x 8 + 6 = 987654; 1234567 x 8 + 7 = 9876543; 12345678 x 8 + 8 = 98765432; 123456789 x 8 + 9 = 987654321
We glide underwater, back and forth,
The end is near! Bring out your dead! 2012 it is. Let's start with cannibal black metal from Poland. I must admit I bought these albums solely because of the superior moniker and because the single-sided 12" Spectres Over Transylvania looks awesome, without having heard one second of the music. And this was a very satisfying black metal blind date: for those into Mayhem's De Mysteriis Dom Sathanas and the ugliest of Darkthrone, doctor Satan recommends large doses of Cultes Des Ghoules and their raw and putrid and grim and gloom and crawling lo-fi black metal delivered in extra long songs with a lot of class. The don't reinvent the sharpened flint, they use big ones to harvest your meat for the sacrifice to the monolith and you will cry for more. So much that Spectres is one of my favorites 2011 releases, ah yes I almost forgot the Church Of Zer top 2011: Old Head, Brutal Truth, Bulldozer, Vektor, JaKa, Attitude Adjustment, Origin, Zeni Geva, Saxon, Artillery, Articles Of Faith and so on. Rah Jah!
421100 Motor vehicle & motor vehicle parts & supplies
Now that I have my internet back, I have quite a bit of typing and photo editing to do. Stay tuned!
Thieving from the poor and needy, closing libraries and public loos wasn't enough to really anger the public.
Nelson Mandela - Former President of South Africa,
"Yep, oo naman. Ipapaalam. (Yep, I will tell him.)"
I tied a bow out of the White Organza Ribbon and adhered it to the front Red label then adhered the heart piece over it.
Frantic landlord.
The article below was written by Rev. Dr. Amb. Sam Kraakevik Kujiyat, who is the Chairman of the Kaduna State chapter of the Christian Association of Nigeria (CAN).
You also started blowing raspberries, sometimes for what seems like hours on end. You learned to do it with your lips months ago, but just in the last few weeks learned to do it with your tongue (a true raspberry).
The Christmas Miracle of Jonathan Toomey by Susan Wojciechowski--Mr. Toomey is well known as the best woodcarver around. However, he is so solemn the village children have nicknamed him Mr. Gloomy. A widow and her son call on him and ask his help in carving a creche in time for Christmas. Little does he know it, but this job is one that will change his life. This story has quickly become a classic since it was first published in 1995. Children and adults love to read this heartwarming story.
The jumper is quite short but i think it's meant to be worn with high-waisted items. I wear a top underneath when wearing it with other things.
I walk by my dad, who is surrounded by other fathers of Irish building stock. Their thick arms and tanned body’s lent over the static tea and sandwiches.
Sooo, it's been a while again.
Being single in the 21st century means having a profile on a dating website. My profile has a few pictures of me, a personal statement, answers to questions about various likes, what I do for fun, taste in music, books and t.v. The basic information one would blather about at a cocktail party. A cocktail party that you have willingly gone to despite the fact that you know no one. That kind of cocktail party. For those who want the down and dirty information about someone, it has a cheat sheet of basic stats: age, level of education attained, job, diet preferences, drinking habits, and so on.
The name Cox’s Bazar/Bazaar originated from the name of a British East India Company officer, Captain Hiram Cox who was appointed as the Superintendent of Palonki (today’s Cox’s Bazar) outpost after Warren Hastings became the Governor of Bengal following the British East India Company Act in 1773. Captain Cox was especially mobilised to deal with a century long conflict between Arakan refugees & local Rakhains at Palonki. The Captain made significant progress in rehabilitation of refugees in the area, but had died (in 1799) before he could finish his work. To commemorate his role in rehabilitation work a market / bazaar was established and was named after him as Cox’s Bazaar (market of Cox). Cox’s Bazar thana was first established in 1854 and a municipality was constituted in 1869.
2. When waffle maker is ready, pour batter and make waffles according to manufacturer's directions. (I was able to make almost 6 waffles and I have this waffle iron.)
Remember, politics in developing countries, as it is in advanced capitalist countries, is about redistribution. If you are a politician, and you can’t tax/subsidise/regulate your way to give your followers ‘stuff’, what do you do? According to Khan, you grab the stuff, and give it your followers.
waiting! Find a way to make your dreams happen.
I image this is a newcomer operation, I could be wrong, it's happened. But as I've often written about, I'm not the biggest fan of sprawling recontextualizations, especially when a Newcomer stripes all that was, save the sign above the door which with its loss of context becomes interesting simply because of irony and disconnect.
And I just couldn’t escape my initial reaction to the opening bars of the first tune, “Uptown,” which was “I wonder if this album would have sounded exactly the same if it was recorded in 1959, even the new stuff?” That, of course, would still be darn good if not uptown exciting.
541400 Specialized design services (including interior, industrial, graphic, & fashion design)
holding it in a tight grip, that will bind me
Anyway, they do, and she does and then is off to the real world to find a spike on top of a Las Vegas casino owned by a crossed-over cartoon character named Vegas Vinnie so that she can become even more human than she became initially and rule this world and the Cool World or other such nonsense. Oh, and Deebs and Frank join forces to try and stop her. Woohoo.
The three above may be my favourites from this jaunt, but I’m still not happy with the colouring in a lot of these final images, although using Levels in PS6 seemed to work well with some in getting everything down into more realistic shades. I think there actually may be an argument for saying that although they look oversaturated, it’s not an inaccurate representation of how the colours looked on the day, given the aforementioned lighting and kits. The skin tones and the whites are correct to my eye, so perhaps we shouldn’t try and change the reds and greens. As always with photography, it’s very subjective.
For an encounter with the Almighty God we need sometimes to get to this place: The place where everything seems lost and it is at that place that we must seek God’s face. Jacob thought he was about to lose everything. His greatest fear was the fear in his own heart. When all seemed lost, God came to him. In our lives, God lets us experience extremes in our hearts, because man’s extremes, are God’s opportunities. It is in these experiences that God reveals Himself to us. Has God allowed you to go through deep waters? It will be in those deep waters when everything seems like it is lost that God will encounter you and change things. You must seek him in those times – go hard if it seems like everything is lost! God is always right there with you – know, believe, and understand that! Seek Him and hold on tight like Jacob did!
In the same way that workers do not exercise control over their unions, or Consumer Co-operatives, because they fail to take an active part in their functioning, so they have failed to take an active part, on a mass scale in the functioning of their Party, and with the obvious consequence, as Roberto Michels set out in his Iron Law Of Oligarchy, that the central bureaucracies, of these organisations, assert their own interests. Those interests are closely connected with the need to continue to function within the existing system. Of course, that is not an argument against building Workers' Parties, or Trades Unions, or Worker Owned Co-operatives - or even participating in Consumer Co-operatives - to fail to do so would be Ultra-Left sectarianism. It is an argument for Marxists to insist on building all these organisations from the ground up, as mass organisations, whose focus is away from bargaining within the existing system, and towards the direct action, and self-organisation, and self-government of the working-class, based on direct participatory democracy, that Marx put forward, and which becomes necessary for workers if they are running their own Co-operative enterprise, their own Co-operative Housing, Community etc.
has started again.
Any thoughts? You know what to do. BETEO
“It’s ok. I knew he wouldn’t take my giving notice well, but I didn’t expect to be escorted out of the office and off the property. Guess I won’t be coming to visit you boys on hockey night any time in the future.”
Put it into a bowl and cover with 1 part water and 1 part apple cider vinegar. Add a squirt of honey, hefty grind of fresh pepper, and a good pinch of salt. If you want, add some fresh herbs. Let this sit at room temp or in the fridge until everything else is ready.
Tina Cisarik and Jamie Visser are two remarkable students who make it their goal every day not only to excel in the classroom, but share their spiritual journeys and kindness with others. While being a full time college student is difficult enough, these students prove that it is possible to manage school work and extracurricular activities, all in the name of faith.
500 words:
oh, if only i could fast forward through this next part! i have been loving having my parents here so much lately. something about them "living" with us feels so natural to me. hmm... can't imagine why it would feel natural to live with your parents? anyone? but it will be great for them to have their own space when they visit, and also soooo great to have the space available to the rest of our huge family and our friends when they want to visit. and i'm sure it will be adorable inside, too. my mom is an incredible decorator. i should have her show you all some pictures of their loft they live in at the lake. its adorable - very french, filled with vintage finds she has scoured thrift stores for. mom, send me some pictures of your loft, ok?
What could be a greater recipe for disaster than Horrid Henry meeting the Queen? It's nice to see this one given the 'early reader' treatment with new illustrations.
SM: Not yet. But soon it'll be required reading. You know, after I take over the world. Kind of like Mao's little red book. But it'll be Scott's Little Pants Book.
The angel hosts with freshness go,
I agree with trying to cook as much as I can from scratch. I love cooking, and I sometimes find that more and more people of my generation (20 and 30 somethings) seem terrified of cooking, as though it was an impossible task. Making my own chicken or vegetable stock only takes a preparation time of maybe 10 to 15m max, but most of my friends here can’t believe I don’t just pour it out of a box. The truth is that cooking is becoming less and less of a daily activity, in North America especially. I had never heard of cooking pasta sauces with canned tomatoes until I moved to Canada a few years ago. I was shocked to find that so many recipes, even by some of the most popular and sophisticated chefs here actually ask you to use canned and processed ingredients. (In Venezuela, we just don’t have the supply of processed foods that we have here. Frozen pizzas even are rare and expensive. TV dinners are non-existent. This is also because women there are still likely to be coming home to cook everyday after a full-time shift and middle to high-income households can afford hired help.)
Tee: I highly doubt the Scots were waking up to bagpipe music every morning.
(Insert nine year old crack high)
(That sounded so complain-y. I’ll make a note to be less of a complainer tomorrow. I mean hey! I don’t have to shovel snow! The streets are safe! I am not frozen to the bone! It’s not so bad.)
This is what I see from my backyard. Is that gorgeous or is that gorgeous? And just to clarify, that large building that looks like an English manor is the golf course club house-people always ask what it is.
Then Dr. Carol came in with her helpers and tried to put water in me with a tube, but me fooled them! Me became the Ninja cat! Has yous seen “Crouching Tiger, Hidden Dragon”? Me is the little tiny oriental girl that destroys all the evil peoples, well, that is me!!!! Me lashed out and while they – Dr Carol and her 2 evil henchmen tried to put the tubes and needles in me, Me did my NINJA CAT moves and me gots blood from all of them!!! Ha! Ha! Nellie got 4!!!!
Excavation takes you much deeper; it digs down to a cellular level, and leaves you feeling brand spanking new.
And yes, sure many of those self-published books those Indie books are horrible. And got news for you. Many of the books done by the Big 6 are just as bad as well. Their editors are horrible. Indeed sometimes I wonder if the editors at the Big 6 are not more than first year college students. They print books based upon name-fame not upon content. So they cannot point fingers here.
With temperatures hovering near 80 today in Georgia, I thought it was time to springify our mantle.
Back at her apartment, I immediately fell on the floor by her couch, felt my head swim in a way I never have before, and puked up all the liquidy contents of my stomach. It was gross. Very gross. And awfully smelly. But it was all liquid. I’m pretty sure she gave me a bucket or a plant pot or something to continue to puke in, but if I used it or not I have no clue. At this point, she continued to yell at me, but for me to “GET THE FUCK OUT OF MY (her) APARTMENT!” However, I countered with, “I would, but I seriously cannot stand up.”
Many of us can remember our mothers wearing aprons. Back in the days when laundry was even more of a pain than it is today, aprons were a practical solution to protecting one's clothing during cooking and other household chores. And there was a time when fancy dress aprons were all the rage. Sometimes made out of silk or organza and often decorated with intricate embroidery or applique, they were worn only for special occasions like dinner parties.
US: I really love this cover. The finished copy has this colourful sheen to it, as well as a stunning cover image and text.
The real world can be terrifying. There are a lot of things you are forced to do as a newly produced college graduate. Many of you will suffer from serious anxiety attacks. In fact, it’s likely that some won’t survive their transformation from college student to adult, unable to adapt to a life that requires you to wake up before noon AND wear semi-presentable clothing every day.
Who can help me escape from the crowd?
“Oh, don’t ask – terrible. I really don’t want to bore you with it all, either. Right now I just want to forget about it all for a while. All I need right now is you…” he replied, moving in for an embrace, but Suzanne backed away, trying to help him remove his coat without touching him.
If you write a strong story that feels more like a one-time read (fun once, but unlikely to be asked for over and over) or that doesn't have a lot of scope for illustration, you may have a magazine piece rather than a picture book. That is great, too. Not every story is strong enough for a picture book, but that doesn't mean it isn't a good story. So make sure you have a children's magazine market list of some type so you can target those stories too.
I used the preserves cartridge for the apple and the Gypsy Wanderings for the tag/wrap...oh and of course my Diamond Dust to give the apple some pizazz!
I would never intentionally give a character the initials "J.C.", though writers from William Faulkner to Stephen King have done exactly this, quite purposefully and thematically.
In the statement Dr. Chiyome Fukino confirms that she and the registrar of vital statistics, Alvin Onaka, had personally verified that the health department holds Obama’s original birth certificate. (Dr. Fukino continues that no state official, including Republican Gov. Linda Lingle, ever instructed that Obama’s certificate be handled differently fgrom any others.)
Today is Skärtorsdagen, according to my English lexicon it’s called “maundy Thursday” (yes I needed a lexicon for that. Who use that word more than once a year? And who ever have to translate it more than once? I’ll try to remember it next year).
Cris Carter: 1,101 catches, 13,899 yards, 130 TDs
I'm tired of being told that drug addicts have a disease, and I must help support and treat them, and pay for the damage they do. Did a giant germ rush out of a dark alley, grab them, and stuff white powder up their noses while they tried to fight it off? I don't think Gay people choose to be Gay, but I #@*# sure think druggies chose to take drugs. And I'm tired of harassment from cool people treating me like a freak when I tell them I never tried marijuana.
Even though I knew they were going without me, because I avoided the issue it was like it wasn’t actually happening. I didn’t have to face up to it. Every time L or W spoke to me about how I felt about it I ended up in tears.
And so I am.
*Movement?: Surely, you didn't miss the part where I told you I already have an 8 pound baby inside me, with 29 days still to go....so, of course, there is still movement.....and strong movement!!! Yesterday, he stuck his toes up and I could feel them. My friend, who was over at the time, also felt them. We had a game of "This Little Piggy" already!!! ;-)
Answer. Furniture coverings. 1. Tablecloth 2. Bedspread 3. Slipcover 4. Quilt
NEVER GIVE UP -- NEVER GIVE IN
One of the men in Brenda and Michael’s and Kelly and Brent’s wedding party was Brad Daufeldt, the youngest brother in the family. We were thrilled when he contacted us to announce his upcoming wedding! The date was to be April 21, 2012 at the Clarion in Iowa City.
What is disturbing about this scenario isn’t the possibility of it happening but that it’s something that can be prevented. Some point out that nuclear weapons have to date kept the world out of full-scale wars like the First and Second World Wars. In a way they are right, the devastating nature of these weapons reminded world leaders not to brazenly use them…to date. But the reality is that the genie is out of the bottle. Trying to wish away nuclear weapons and reduce stockpiles may be a pipe dream. The capacity for war will exist within us for a very long time and so is the will to develop deadlier weapons. Perhaps one day, when humanity has matured past the point of war will it be feasible to put aside this nightmare.
Paper Flowers
Today I read 2 books cover to cover,
I blew it, is there still a chance. Yeas there is still a chance and here’s what you want to do. You write a short note and include these things. Don’t add to eat and don’t take away from it. Would you like to learn more? Controversial; Tactics and has been called mind control. This not for stalkers, not be use for revenge, to for Cuckoos, Crazies or Weirdos.
I was very lucky at Christmas and got lots of crafty goodies, including these Darkroom Door stamps, which I have wanted for a while, and there are some great sentiments in the tin (the tin is also fab). I was stamping up some of the images the other night and thought they looked good as a background, and better still on pink cardstock with brown ink than black/white, So .....I stamped again with brown ink on a slightly paler pink card for the main image and sentiment, both matted onto brown cardstock and then attached with 3Dfoam.
*”Baked beans and the Rolling Stones. A client’s idea if I ever heard one.”
:: Jacob scored a goal in a lacrosse game last week... it's a rare thing for a defensive player... he is playing long pole middie these days
Do you not see Him
Inspired, we were. Alone, we were not. As soon as we came back to Richmond and told other RichmondWCR members and other chefs, we now have a collective force behind our steps to improve school nutrition programs in Metro Richmond schools. We are eager to start, but schools are on summer vacation right now.
- Cut liver into slices.
In 2004, a guy named Jim Nail, Principle Analyst for Forrester Research, had this to say to The New York Times...
Renowned Jeffreys Bay artist Stephen Bibb joined the war against crime by donating one of his paintings (below_ to an individual or an organization that has signed up as a member by the end of June 2009.
I have tried to emulate that experience of finding fun people to play with in TOR too. But it’s been… well, a mixed bag. I seem to play at all the wrong times for the guilds I’ve joined. By the time I log on, there’s one person other person online. I do enjoy the actual game though, the story is exactly what I always wanted from my WoW experience. But I miss the social atmosphere and ease of just hopping in and out of groups from WoW. Say what you want about the Dungeon Finder, it was a godsend to shy people like me. And when the topic gets approached on the TOR forums, someone usually not-so-politely states that if you’re not a social butterfly, you need to GTFO from MMOs. How kind.
To myself, I’d like to say: Stop posting about religion and politics, at least for the rest of the holiday season.
And when career Marine Corps Master Sgt. Jerry Ensminger suspected that his nine-year-old daughter’s death might have an environmental cause at Camp Lejeune in North Carolina, he came upon a “cover-up by the Marine Corps of one of the largest drinking water contaminations in U.S. history.” The Marine Corps learned of the carcinogenic chemicals in the groundwater at the base in 1980 and refused to officially notify the residents for another 28 years, an admission finally provoked by Sgt. Ensminger’s indefatigable campaign that went national (see the documentary “Semper Fi: Always Faithful”).
Setting factors in a dryer for concerning 20 minutes to kill lice and nits destroy. Also you will want to clean your house really well. It may have a rusty colored or yellow. Effectiveness of olive oil is that it is difficult for lice to survive and move into the oil, producing them simpler to catch. If you or your family is itching a lot and have a rash, it is major to get an precise diagnosis so that treatment can begin.
‘There is no such… concept,’ Sydrill said eventually.
I painted that island apple green, and it was a total and complete disaster. It was one of those where you say you just need time to “get used to it” when you really just need time to stop hyperventilating at all the time you just flushed down the toilet. ;)
6. 1 carrot cut into cubes, some sliced tomatoes, 1/2 capsicum (optional).
Life is busy!
“Where do you think I am learning all of this information?” Brulee asked with a smile. “Now please be trying to light the orb.”
I apologise for my night-time wonky photo. Considering the conditions, it didn't turn out too bad. :-)
Nature Miracles
from the desire of being preferred to others,
- The last one, I like surprises, but on the other hand I guess everyone does :)
The attack, which took place in front of Younus’s then five-year-old son, left her unable to breathe and fighting for life.
and will reveal our private motives.
First there’s the rabid Arsenal supporter who’ll bore to death anyone I talk to on matters of club football; lamenting injustices against Arsenal, standing up for perceived weaker players and overdoing it a bit with praise for the better ones.
At City Hall, Ann presents their fountain solution: remove the splashguard completely, which is safe and cost-effective. Impressed, Ron sits down with Ann to discuss her future with City Hall, but Ann stops him when she admits it was April’s idea and she told Ann to take the credit. Ron finds April and asks her if she would step up to take on some of Leslie’s work. She refuses at first, saying she doesn’t want to do things, which is exactly what Ron taught her. Despite this, they both decide it’s time for April to step up and call Chris to deliver the good news.
“I brought you into this world, and I can take you out…”
“It’s always good to end the day on top, but we have to remember that in testing lap times mean very little. Having said that, the car felt great and I was very comfortable from the start. This test gives us an opportunity to try things that we wouldn’t have time to do during a race weekend, so hopefully it’ll help us to keep pushing forward. We’ve done a lot of setup work today, and for sure we’ll need to take some time to look through all the data and analyse what we need to focus on tomorrow, but it’s a good baseline for the final day.”
My weight continues to drop. It’s down about 10 lbs. from a month or so ago. I’ve adhered to the tenets of the diet for the most part but I fudge by having cereal in the morning. I feel pretty good and my belts are cinching a little tighter these days. Some carbs in the morning, no carbs the rest of the day. We’ll see if it is sustainable. Vegas wouldn’t touch those odds.
It is like PR in showbusiness and the media.
embellishments I have to meet it and then see how I can use them.
There is a saying, “The best impression may be your last impression.” And, I take this a step further and say, “You may have only one time to make your best impression! So, place yourself in a good position to leave a solid lasting impression.”
I was petting one of my cats today and the other three affection whores came trotting over trying to get in on the action. ugh. I walked away feeling used and much like the lady that feeds the pigeons in the park…
was jobless, timid, with two young children
“In the parlor with Addie, I do believe,” Alma responded, still stirring her dumplings.
Me: But here's the thing: Danny doesn't actually have any friends.
Commodianus
Now or in the future.
Talwin Morris replied thus:
So for the 2010 historical record: A six pack of Buffalo Bill’s Pumpkin Ale purchased at Cost Plus was found to be sour smelling and tasting with intermittent flaky, paper-like floaters. A random single of Buffalo Bill’s Pumpkin Ale purchased at Total Wine was found to be sour smelling and tasting with small speck-like floaters.
S.U.C.K.A.’s study found that in the end, no matter what you do, life will inevitably kill you.
The buttons are from my stash, which seems to be growing on a weekly basis, I love buttons!
With their size, the physician organizations can and are becoming the driving force in helping their physician members adopt electronic health or medical records and investigate whether an accountable care organization should be in their future.
Add the egg and one cup of whole wheat flour. Blend on low until the egg is incorporated then beat on medium for 2 more minutes. Add the oats, 1 cup whole wheat flour, and 1 cup bread flour. Continue mixing for a few minutes until it's smooth and elastic.
Let this piece be a constant reminder of your thoughts and actions in our walk with Jesus Christ!
whereas the lines at many bars are 20 to 30 meters long.
Cook the waffles until golden and crisp. Transfer the waffles immediately from the iron to plates, or keep them warm in the oven. Serve the waffles with syrup, fresh fruit and softened butter.
I could not question the ethics of what I saw,
Consulting with GriefCom's Foreign Rights Chair Charles Sheffield, it soon became clear that Dave's complaint was the tip of the iceberg. There was an enormous problem with rights sales to German and other European publishers, affecting many SFWA members, including Andre Norton, Robert Jordan, and Terry Pratchett. Short stories and novels were being sold to European publishers, but authors weren’t receiving royalties; in many cases, writers weren't even aware that the sales had been made. (Here's a typical complaint.)
THE BERLIN CROSSING opens with a short prologue set in 1962, as an East German soldier on duty on the Berlin Wall shoots dead a man who is trying to cross the no-man’s land into West Berlin. Oddly, the man appears to smile as he dies.
You can use any kind of nuts: almonds, walnuts, pecans or even pistachios. You can also add lemon zest (especially with the almonds) or any flavoring of your choice.
(Irrelevant portions omitted)
However if Taib is still around and Awang Tengah can move up by hook or by crook to grab his crown , then Adenan Satem ‘special functions’ is not needed anymore, i.e. he is not needed in the cabinet.
Katarina Witt was born in Staaken, East Germany in 1965.
And that lining? It didn't make me feel slimmer. After about 20 minutes of playing, it made me feel like I was being swallowed by a huge spandex python. Worse, the lining started rolling up on itself. Then it started riding up my legs.
Omega is endless or ends altogether.
cried out in desperation
It was around 4:40 pm when we finally left for the hospital and I was doing my best NOT to push and making sounds I didn't know I could produce. We hit every stop light on the way...well, it sure felt like we did. Jeremy finally took a side road with only stop signs and we rushed as fast as possible. We parked in front of the hospital when we realized it was Sunday and we were supposed to go through emergency. We decided to ignore that little rule and Jeremy pushed me quickly through the hospital in a wheelchair...we got lost because Labour and Delivery had moved since we got there. It only delayed us by a minute or two but I was getting desperate by that point.
Once the paint was dry, I sewed the two sides of the pillow together (right sides together), leaving a slit to flip the pillow right side out.
But not all sour Belgians are made the same. Their are of course the spontaneously-fermented lambic family, but also these two beers that are hard to distinguish--browns and reds. It doesn't help that there's no consistent method of naming. You hear "Flanders" or "Flemish" used interchangeably as modifiers, and "brown" and "red" used inconsistently. Generally speaking, browns are referred to as either "oud bruins" or Flanders browns (except Liefmans, the standard, which refers to itself, contra world opinion, as a "Flemish brown"). Reds are generally referred to as Flemish reds.
Once you attain the light brown colour, add the sugar, crank up the heat to medium and let it turn darker. This could take about 8 to 10 minutes.
As children we always had Saturday morning Cartoons to look forward after a long hard week of School. Now there is no such thing, there are so many Cable and Satellite Channels that Saturday morning Cartoons have been rendered obsolete with the over saturation of Cartoons in 50,000 different channels that it’s hard to keep up. So for us old timers, Alvin and the Chipmunks are gearing up for the third film and were honored with their very own Hand and Footprint Ceremony at the Grauman’s Chinese Theater in Hollywood. Let’s take a look.
Okay. Tell me a little tidbit about your experience with classical ("classical") music.
Jamie Moyer has face ten different active managers -- Mattingly, Bochy, Gibson, Girardi, Guillen, Matheny, Melvin, Roenicke, Scioscia and Ventura -- and while he did not face Ron Washington, he did face U.L.
Many times, I have surcomb to these fears and worries and let others people’s opinion of me, hold me back into believeing that my dreams can come true. I have given up many times and fallen short of the success God had put in front me, just because of the comments of people I loved and adored thought less of me and my low self-esteem agreed, so I would give up thinking that they may be right, but now I’m beginning to realize that their own opinions of me does not define who I am, but reflects on the outlook of themselves. Those who are successful will inevitably assist you to see you succeed and unsuccessful people will not want to see you rise, because they start to reflect upon their life and don’t want to leave their comfort zone.
In addition, I notice that Atta, amongst other former Northern Alliance members, has also been commenting favourably on the potential for reaching a political deal with Hezb-e Islami Gulbuddin. They may judge that this could undermine the Taliban’s bargaining position. During the 1990s, alliances between HIG and the Northern Alliance were perhaps best characterised as short-term, shaky and unreliable…
In November, while I was in Cancun celebrating my 20th wedding anniversary, contestant numbers were chosen. I was chosen Contestant #1. To be honest, that didn't bother me. I've been a performer all my life, so I don't have much fear of the stage.
The project I have to share with you today is an altered cd tree ornament featuring Joanne Schempp's Wings of Love:
Megas og Senuþjófarnir
He spent his later years as a philanthropist, on the boards of the Carnegie Institution and the Museum of Natural History. When he died in 1903, Andrew Carnegie himself claimed the former mayor was "America's foremost private citizen".
So tomorrow I am going to make another change. I am going to do something I haven’t done before with my class: I am going to put down a book and select a new one that has a better fit. I still want to read a story relevant to Illinois history and Abraham Lincoln, but I need one that is more appropriate for my purposes and for my students.
And I fretted for daily treasures I couldn't salvage.
Now I don't know how many of you who read this are single out there, but during my time as an Internet dater I compiled a list of a sort of "code" my girlfriends and I picked up on, on what the men would tell us and what it really meant. So consider this my public service announcement to you single ladies and men too out there who might be considering online dating. Again you're welcome.
Congrats to Mark O’Callaghan on the success of Tactico Board Game on RTE 1 Dragons Den.The the best of luck in the future from Arcon Recruitment.
be as faithful
With a heavier heart you walk
05. Unlock The Mystery
What is the nature of the conversation between Washington and Beijing? I assume that the USG has no interest in embarrassing the Government of China. But that Government has its hands full with domestic matters which could impact how it handles Mr. Chen’s escape from a harsh house arrest.
-the above category with minimum $1,000 in property taxes for 1+ years
And we got this:
And enveloped our car.
I must apologise that I have not been visiting everyone lately - I could list all the boring reasons why, but I won't! Please know that I intend to get around to visiting everyone over the school holidays in my spare time (go on laugh).
I think nerds are this way too. We need people we can go off on tangents with without worrying we're boring them and while a book nerd can surely befriend a computer nerd, sometimes you just need to be with your own kind. I think that book people can find this especially difficult given what solitary tasks writing and editing are.
If the parties refuse to accept the administrative punishment or the administrative redress decision, administrative action may be raised, according to the law.
Inside those books, he said, is information about “the beginning of the collapse of the human race,” which will take place during the next two decades.
One of such events was the outbreak of the Bubonic Plague or the deadly Black Death for which there was no remedy. When they could not find any logical reason for this epidemic, they blamed the witches for its spread. Similarly, whenever there were bad harvests, fires that burnt down the houses or when the foods were curdled, the blame was targeted at the witches.
I really don't give a damn about fashion and I don't really care that much about how I look, but I do care about not wanting to look like a very bad joke.
the officer finally said that they would
with the feverish anxiety of the day I gave you all my being
The study concluded that such special conditions make the 35-mph zone of the bypass appropriate.
Yesterday, in class, we had a discussion about the concept of “Making a living from being an Author.”
transitive verb
July ~ Wort, Hay or Buck Moon
Any Which Wave
I’m having trouble coming up with good ecology quotes. Casual googling mostly turns up quotes about environmentalism. I do really like an old bumper sticker which some former grad student of Peter Morin’s stuck on the lab vehicle (to Peter’s annoyance, or so I heard). It read “Ecology is as easy as…” and then completed the sentence with the equilibrium conditions for the Lotka-Volterra competition equations.
The names of stars,
Motorbiking is brilliant. It’s like riding an ordinary bike but without the annoying pedalling part. The sense of freedom, the whole Steve McQueen romance of it, is beautiful.
Have I mentioned that October is my favorite month of the year? Here in Maine it means apple-picking, cider, trees with leaves the color of lit matches, crisp nights of the open-the-window-a-crack-and-pile-on-the-blankets variety, and chilly days of the pack-up-the-picnic-basket-and-dress-warmly-to-share-lunch-by-the-sea (or the pond, or the stream, or on top of the little mountain just up the road) variety.
It's a Wonderful Life.
There was no shortage of grimacing and muttering from a tired and unhappy looking Woods as he battled through the final holes, struggling but avoiding a total meltdown that would have left him missing the cut.
13.radio jimi
1) If you want to take less of a financial risk you can get you show on the web and start gaining sponsors. The Hunting Channel Online, has one of the best programs available for new start up shows, we make it possible for you to get paid while building your business, email info@huntsecrets.com to find out more about this opportunity
These next few posts will be a series on gardening from information that I've gleaned both from experience as well as attending a class for gardening specifically in our area. Hopefully this information will be helpful to those who are looking to start a garden or improve their gardens for this year.
This being the height of a summer heat wave throughout much of the East Coast, and considering that we just had a solar eclipse across a narrow band of the Southern Hemisphere, and considering that today is “Sunday,” let me tell you a little about our sun.
Remember when Barack Obama was running for election? Remember how the line was that he was going to fix things and improve relations with our allies after 'Cowboy' Bush?
My son graduated from high school last friday, so darn exciting, it had to be the windest day in history. Every graduate had to hold there caps down tHe entire time, one girls hat flew off and across the field before she even hit the grass. I have no pictures of him with the family with the cap and gown on (windy) he promised to take some shots for me later! My 75-300 zoom lense was fabulous, I was like the paparazzi during the ceremony with my Camera!
Pity we didn’t get some of our jobs done!!!!!
This morning, I do not regret the editing. I don’t want to raise my boy saying those sorts of things, and the first books you fall in love with are the ones you remember for life.
I finished my coffee and cake in the cafe, then as it was were closing for the day, the owner drove me to the Waterfront Bar on the town seafront and I spent a very pleasant hour or so watching the world go by waiting for Nick (who’d flown 63km, and Richard who’d done about 15km) to come and meet me. As I enjoyed another coffee I thought back to something I’d said at the Club talk on Thursday – it really is insane what we do when we fly XC on our flimsy craft. I mean, to fly half way across Wales over some of the wildest countryside in the UK and land by the sea, using nothing more than a glider than can be packed up into a rucksack is truly amazing – we are genuinely privileged to be able to enjoy this incredible sport.
After a slight exposure to japanese, I feel it sounds closer to north eastern and bengal pronounciations.
Next....
In 2011 I spent a good four months rewriting it. I then got sidetracked by another ms which was also getting a lot of interest.
All I can say upon initial talking to her is I would sit at her bar ALL NIGHT!!!! One word.......... Gorgeous!!!! But its alot more than just a pretty face to this bartender.... Erendida is a bartender at Vibe nightclub(Formerly Crobar) here in Chicago. But enough from me, Ill let Erendida tell you about her yourself.... Here's a brief Bio......
On the agenda was Medieval Times, The American Girl store, Legoland, & eating (who doesn't enjoy eating on vacation).
I painted this for the April challenge on Daily Painters International. The theme is The Wind. The artist can choose any subject that evokes wind. I decided on this scene of clothes drying in the breeze.
I begin to focus on school but it was enough to take my mind off of things, my grades begin to suffer and I became depressed, I would go days without eating, staying in bed the entire day. My life hit rock bottom, so I was going through the college catalog and I saw Ceramics. I did not even know what it consisted of but I knew it was made from clay, I feel in love, and I have been a addict since.
The bride looks beautiful. She is stunning and my wish for her tomorrow is that she takes a deep breath, and remembers to take it all in because tomorrow is about her (and the groom of course - but he has made a point of NOT reading my blog so this is all about the lovely Lauren), but she has wanted this wedding for so long, and my wish for her is that she enjoys every second of it.
Neuroscience is uncovering a bracing view of what's happening below the radar of our conscious awareness, but that makes your life no more "helpless, ignorant, and zombie-like" than whatever your life is now. If you were to read a cardiology book to learn how your heart pumps, would you feel less alive and more despondently mechanical? I wouldn't. Understanding the details of our own biological processes does not diminish the awe, it enhances it. Like flowers, brains are more beautiful when you can glimpse the vast, intricate, exotic mechanisms behind them. One problem is that reductionism is very tempting. Reductionism means feeling unsatisfied with making an observation based on evidence — "Hey look, here's something" — and feeling the need to rule out the possible of other types of observations by adding: "And it's the only thing." Reductionism can make people feel contrarian and scientific, without actually being scientific. There can be multiple layers of explanation that are all accurate and not mutually exclusive; different kinds of description can peacefully coexist.
As for the tattoos, he still sends me pictures of his work every day. I have a little gallery of people's body parts on my phone, which is comical.
On May 29, 1999, Kramer's Ford Aerostar minivan and skeletal remains were found by photographers looking for old car wrecks to shoot at the bottom of Decker Canyon near Malibu, California. Based on forensic evidence and Kramer's emergency call to the police, authorities ruled his death as a probable suicide committed on the day on which he was last heard.
Can't wait to see what you have to share!
Jarrod & Gary
Other things to point out
My longest bike ride was 50k, which I did twice (and one very close at 47). Next week, my long ride distances will be bumping up. I’m excited but scared! We get so much damn wind in this city, that it makes it super challenging. Although I guess that will just make me a stronger cyclist once race day gets here.
ANYTHING LESS HEAVY TO TRY?
Noah is one of the best grandchildren anyone could ever hope for. He's loving, kind, and thoughtful. He's a good student, a good brother, and a good sport. We're very proud of you Noah and we hope your birthday was stellar! (We've already heard that your Lego party was.)
¼ c grated parmesan cheese
First AME Child Development Center, MLK Site
Whatever weather you may be enjoying/enduring (please delete as appropriate! LOL), I hope too that you get the idea of Spring from my card today, using of course this fabby image from Mo Manning called 'Nelly'. Of course, the trouble with making cards that are not square is that they never show up nicely on Blogger - even when made 'large' I find that I can't really see them properly so you might, like me, have to click on the image to see it better.
You don’t pick for money
Um.....no. But I guess it was a sweet thought.
There weren’t all too many familiar faces around, but it was very nice talking to the few I saw. And I got invited to a loli meet-up too! Haven’t been to one in ages, definitely going if I don’t have work.
10.Blank Generation
Pantheism offers the idea that everything is god or a part of god. Beliefs such as Hinduism, propose that 390+ million gods exist, evil is illusory (an illusion or perceptual, open to interpretation), the universe is essential eternal (so creation is not linear but circular), SO, other principles such as rebirth of souls (reincarnation), and a guiding code such as Karma must be in place (this to provide for inevitable progression or digression of the succession of a person’s existence until they become one with a transpersonal god as the ideal reality).
But that the dread of something after death,
This film also provides a first hand look at a bona fide Bigfoot conference in Honobia, Oklahoma. In addition, we get a glimpse at a possible sasquatch hair sample, and are shown a considerable amount of evidence from other amateur researchers.
So here I am, starting a brand new blog. My idea for this blog is to share my journey though parenthood with you. My plan (as indicated by the title) is to update daily. Of course, this is coming from someone who has yet to fully understand all of what parenthood requires. So I’m predicting that ultimately this will not end up being a daily blog (because let’s face it, not only will life catch up to me, but eventually I’ll lose interest too), but at the start, that will be my intent. Daily postings, be it of some new thing I’ve learned, some new insight I’ve gained, or just a quick little note about something that happened that day that was significant.
Cold rainy, and windy out this weekend. Haven't been out at all . My legs are really sore and stiff. Don't know why.
From day one of Paul’s ministry the devil sought his life. We have an example of this in Acts 9. He preached Christ, the Son of God in the synagogues and in verse 23, “The Jews took counsel to kill him.” He escaped at night over the city wall in a basket.
Mound the filling in center of the dough leaving 2 in border around the edges.
Hunter conceded that should his measure become law, it could be politically detrimental to his party, but to him the most accurate picture of unemployment in the U.S. ranks above politics.
McLaren use a split cooling outlet set up, rather than Red Bull who tend to focus all the outlet area into the large bulged exit high up on the engine cover. McLaren’s main outlets are the exit to the sidepods coke bottle shape. With outlet area to the side of, and above the gearbox. This is aided by 3-slotted louvers on the flanks of the sidepods.
This is probably the most frustrating part of the vision process. We can write and we can work, but ultimately, we always have to wait. Tarrying is an old school term for waiting and in English, we typically define it as a passive act. However, it is actually an authoritative act. In short, we are empowered to do what we must until the God-given visions come to past.
4. Whisk together butter and sugar on high for about 3 minutes, until light and fluffy. Add the eggs one at a time, whisking between additions. Add the vanilla extract followed by the flour mixture. Remove 1 cup of batter and add to the berry puree, combining thoroughly. Pour batter-berry mixture back to remainder of batter and fold in so that the batter is streaked with blue.
65 654 6543.......65432
In November the Bears play away games at San Francisco, week 11 a Monday night game, and Tennessee, week nine. The Bears play home games verse the Vikings, week 12, and Texans, week 10 a Sunday night game (subject to change).
Here’s why: last February, Xenophone was among 50 Australian lawmakers demanding that the sodomy charge be dropped. That’s fine, since Xenophone is among the many foreign politicians and activits won over by Anwar in his full-frontal public relations assault against the Malaysian government.
The sea around Britain has been found to be more acidic than many other areas, partly because of ocean currents, but mainly because Europe and North America are the largest polluters of carbon dioxide! Experiments show that even a small increase in ocean acidity reduces the ability of shellfish and plankton to grow and the population to fall. The loss of coral would seriously affect small islands and coastal regions.
Notes: I halved the recipe and got 4 mugs of pudding
1-2-3 Stitch who will contact you about spending your voucher and don't forget to grab your winner's blinkie
My Pastor, Tim, spoke about thankfulness recently. He told us about a married person whose spouse was only 80% perfect. So they had an affair with someone who could supply the other 20%. Too late they realised that they had settled for 20% instead of the 80% they had had. What a sad place to be in.
8. Life of Pi - Yann Martel
Sara Gothard was one of the artists selected. She has already completed one dog sculpture, and is currently working on her second.
Melt the butter in a small skillet and add about half of the minced garlic. Stir for a minute or so, then add the bread cubes and saute until they are golden. Remove from heat and set aside.
Supple and turbulent, a ring of men
I'll begin with the "big project", the refinishing of the mirror. I had originally scored this at a yard sale last year. It had a cherry red finish which didn't match anything in my house, so I sanded and stained it a dark espresso brown (the same stain used on the console table my dad built for us).
Always Infinity 12 ct+, Always Radiant Infinity $1/1
Sunday I started on the garden. It needs to be turned and we want to enlarge it and straighten it up this year. This is all I got done, about an 18” - 20” wide strip before my hands started complaining. It is hard, clayey, grass had encroached as well as roots from the tree. It didn't get turned last fall after the long hot dry summer. If I was smart, I'd go rent a tiller instead of using my hands, a claw, and a shovel but I'm not sure I could
Let shadows fall back to a rivet that flows by.
Who is Rick Mercer? He’s a Canadian comedian who convinced many Americans to state idiotic and ignorant things about Canada on camera, including famous professors and George W. Bush, who we all know wasn’t the sharpest knife in the drawer. You can wiki him, if you’re very curious, or watch “Talking with Americans” on Youtube. http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Talking_to_Americans
I have "real" PMS for the first time in many, many years. It's not terrible, but it's bad enough that I wish I could just hole up in my basement for this week instead of having to deal with the public. I want yummy, fried things for meals, and I constantly have a low grade headache which I keep forgetting to take Advil for before I leave the house in the morning and I can't remember to refill my little Advil bottle in my purse either so I'm just suffering all day long, dammit.
along with a new question to be answered right here on my blog.
- I do not know what to say mate. I am sorry you got treated that way.
What you need to know...
A good combination is key, but the connecting story is also important. This story was somewhat creative but it wasn’t executed that well. I thought it was a little short, and some of the key story points could have been extended. As you might have guessed from the trailer the three main leads feel it necessary to kill their bosses. I thought they could have extended the idea of why they needed to kill their bosses. They seemed to gloss over it a little too quick. The movie had so many different chances to be a good film and it let me down.
i'm so glad i was able to end 2011 on a good note as far as reading goes. there have definitely been some ups & downs this year, but this was definitely a high.
For my spiritual toning up I dusted off my Bible, put away my magazines and got out a good devotional book and occasionally an uplifting novel.
The next day, Todd, over being taken by our jokes, began creating ways to have fun with Grannie Gertie.
91) Girl, you so fine! I wish I could plant you and grow a hole field of you!
I am one of those people who usually has a "feeling" about things. You know those people. Most of the time we are irritating because our gut ALWAYS has an opinion. I have a million stories about how I had a certain feeling about someone or something, and it turned out to be true. Sometimes my body tells me things and I don't tap into it, so even though I hear it, I don't listen.
For more I.T./I.T. for BPO/KPO jobs, please visit:www.itpilipinas.wordpress.com
Used as transport in desert caravans.
Ok, the first one... My jaw almost dropped when I saw this charm bracelet. Can't Stop Making Things created this one of a kind very unique piece of jewelry. I need to keep some of my kids small toys, just to make this bracelet!
Witnessing the contentment, joy and absence of struggle he was clearly enjoying, moment-to-moment, it was fairly obvious that he had arrived at a pretty happy place in his consciousness, stroke or no stroke. The wheelchair and the condition of his body were truly irrelevant to his primary self-identity as “loving awareness,” a term from his current book, “Be Love Now.” The new title ups the ante, nearly 40 years later, from merely being here now to being love now. I’m guessing they are interdependent, however, and arise together; if you are truly and fully present in the here and now, love is the inevitable outcome. Conversely, if you are truly “being love,” you will find yourself in the here and now. But the one-word change in the title points the reader in an ever-so-subtly different direction, imbuing one’s journey with a somewhat softer focus, somehow, perhaps a bit like moving from the austerity of a zendo to the bhakti-infused devotion of a Hindu temple.
“There’s a school of magic devoted to suction?” asked Jagred.
My hopes were soaring. Contractions were increasingly painful but very bearable. The breaks in between gave me enough time to try and sleep, I laid on the couch with a blanket as I remember getting chilly. Ocean painted watercolors at the table while my midwife worked on her embroidery. It was so calm. I kept looking at Marc and smiling- I could not contain my excitement! My family arrived and everyone was beaming. I was on my yoga ball and working my way through contractions. It was about 9:00 and I was at a 7...I tweeted:
Total Loss: 22.2
Sometimes Pottermore works well for me and sometimes it doesn’t. When I try to send a gift (a Chocolate Frog card, for example) to another user, such as my brother, sometimes it won’t let me. Also, I still haven’t figured out how to upload drawings. (You’re supposed to be able to upload fan art. I can’t draw, so I wasn’t going to upload anything, but I still think I should’ve been able to find the upload button by now, and I can’t.)
I enjoy posting about my growing view stats. It is a way of expressing my unimaginable gratitude to you all — you, the people who actually make those stats creep up to glorious heights.
so i’ve taken to my knees. i guess i should take to them for something, right? so far i don’t see or feel the effects, other than some discomfort in my right knee, but i’m going to keep it up for a while and try my very best to regain faith in the higher power i spent a good two years talking to every day.
I really like how the globe came out by itself. I can think of lots of nice uses for this portion of the illustration.
She has tried to survive,
But are enough of us properly armed and motivated for a true combat of ideas?
Thanks for visiting my porch today. Please come back!
It is very funny. Not laugh-out-loud funny (although Sarge and Hedgie do), with the exception of the stinky cheese episode, but titter funny. I enjoy a wildly funny book, some favorites being P.J. O'Rourke's works ("Holidays in Hell" and "Give War a Chance" to name a couple), and Woody Allen's "Without Feathers." I have been known to laugh myself giddy over those. Not so "Three Men" and I suppose I will leave it at that.
She said "There it is, daddy!" in that voice that is the essence of a child's glee. I felt a surge of pride, wonder and gratitude that the day had taken me there. She smiled and my heart followed. This was the wonder of creation, the joy of something unspoiled by the grinding of life. That someone could take so much delight in a simple act of creation! My god, the amount of beauty there is when we let ourselves see!
No, the aimless, self-involved hipsters are not the counterculture of our generation. It’s the global revolutionaries.
What was the reaction like to that record once you guys put it out, what was the general critical reaction of the teeming millions?
My dad loved to fish for trout on the edge of the white water rivers of the Rockies. He knew the currents were dangerous and that his sons could be careless. He’d scout out the safe places to cross the river. He’d walk us down the bank until we found a line of stable rocks. He’d test the stones, knowing if they held him, they’d hold us. Then he’d signal us to follow.
On Thursday Cooper turned 2. It seems almost impossible. It was such an emotional day I have to say. Of course I am joyful for the little man God brought into our life 2 years ago. But I also couldn't help but think how far we'd come from that day and in the days to come shortly after.
Predestination has even wormed its way into science. Atomism was already old news when Darwin published his masterwork in 1859, and ever since scientists have been chasing down a biological basis to every trait under the sun, from to religious belief to alcoholism to left-handedness. The 'ghost in the machine' was perhaps never there at all. It was all machine, no ghost.
I continue to be amazed that folks get upset when a politician does not keep a promise once in office.
Look, it’s hard to bag on random acts of kindness. Makes me seem like even more of a jerk. “Oh, you faceless blogger, you’re hating on Misha sending his minions out to deliver flowers to strangers.” You know what, when 15 cents on the dollar is going to Pakistan and 52 cents is going to flowers, I think I’ve got a soapbox on which to stand.
Linking up with My Mummy Daze. Go over to her blog to check out her racey red lippy self portrait, as well as the other 52 week project participants. - Posted using BlogPress from my iPhone
For some seriously smooth vintage styled bathers, check out these...I am am a sucker for gingham checks, Hawaiian and nautical things !!! But there are many more fabo styles as well........
such as those M. Gandhi or Martin Luther King, Jr.
I'm talking walls and bins and displays and shelves full of stickers! For the price of one sheet of stickers at a regular store, you could get several sheets. This would be the perfect place for teachers to shop as well.
Sadly, our younger sisters are mistakenly thinking that, by wearing hijaab in this fashion, (without thinking about the rest of their attire), they are fulfilling one of their Islamic duties. Don’t get me wrong, it’s good to see more and more sisters wearing hijaab. But it’s time we got this right and looked at hijaab in the way the Wives of the Prophet (pbuh) adopted it – they are our role models.
My thoughts. Again this seems so obvious, I chafe at the thought of applying it. I realize this is my own arrogance since even knowing it I don’t do it enough.
Yet President Obama – visibly not a black-skinned person – is called ‘black’ as a term of respect.
-Itching for a break
(The waiter brings the wine, which Tilda tests and approves. He pours, then places the wine in an icebox. A candle is lit and a violinist plays Bach nearby. Tilda receives her three-course meal, ending with a soufflé with fruit salad.)
“In the simmering hot summer of 1492, a monstrous evil is stirring within the Eternal City of Rome. The brutal murder of an alchemist sets off a desperate race to uncover the plot that threatens to extinguish the light of the Renaissance and plunge Europe back into medieval darkness.
Slowly it circles around me.
*Dress like a boxer and carry rocks in a bag or just wear a pair of boxers over your jeans and carry gravel….. “Rocky”
I’ve a new Accountant. Well, actually, He’s been around forever, but I just recently realized what a wonderful job He does in keeping track of checks and balances.
I have been trying not to start any new knitting projects until I am at least done with the socks or the shawl I have done ok so far but not sure how much longer I can hold out. I have been browsing the patterns on Raverly.
Many times a licensor, especially one in a strong position, will make no warranty or representation of any kind, express or implied concerning any matter in the agreement. In effect, no warranty is extended. Courts do not always recognize this practice, however. At the same time, if the agreement is silent with respect to a warranty, the licensee should not consider a warranty as implied. The understanding of the parties must be expressed in the agreement. Therefore, the licensee should negotiate as best he can to obtain a meaningful warranty.
I actually don’t have time to put make up on so what I did is I used photoshop to add make up. For the smokey eye effect I used the mixer brush and blur effect and lessen the opacity to make it more realistic.
Nopy is right. Times had changed, and people change, and so people’s anime tastes change too. When people ask me what anime I like best, I actually had trouble answering them, but I guess that’s what happen when one had a 10-year long history with anime. Over the years, my “best anime” had been changing over and over, here, I’ll share everyone, my “list of best anime” in a chronological timeline order.
This week, me and CB had CB’s long-time collaborator in indie films, writer, actor and storyteller, Travis Jones on the show. Not only did we talk about everything, like we do every week, but Travis told some amazing stories about his life, including failed romances that while humiliating are all too familiar and relatable. Even more exciting is the fact that this is our TENTH podcast, meaning that if two assholes sit down and b.s. with each other long enough, someone WILL listen.
In all cases, be it Abraham, Saul or the disciples, they did not know what was going to happen. Had they known, it would not require faith for faith is defined in Hebrews 11:1; “Now faith is the substance of things hoped for, the evidence of things not seen.”
어떤 것도 막을 수 없어 점점 더 내게 더
I went back to a trusty pattern from the wonderful Topkids magazine. I've made this blouse for my daughter previously and just love how feminine and fresh it turns out.
Probably she had her reasons or it is just plain greed, deriving happiness on the thought of other customer’s spite. It is the same case if Warren Buffet decided to spend all his fortune to buy all the food he can acquire, leaving third-world countries into starvation. Whatever the case, I personally don’t mind, I have plenty of food at home and my Tang (my dad), even at 57, still bothers to bring me delectable food every other day. The fact that greed is manifested even at this small scale is truly alarming. They should start quarantining our politicians before this greedy epidemic consumes all of us. Seriously, just because you have the means to do something, it doesn’t mean you have the right to pull off it off. This is something to think about during this long weekend.
At Oxford Gardens, a diverse primary school in the inner-London borough of Kensington and Chelsea, the number of scooting pupils has risen from fewer than one in 100 in 2005 to almost one in seven—while the proportion of children arriving by car has fallen from 20% to 16%. Half a dozen schools in the borough report scooter-commuting rates of over 30%.
We had duck, sweet n sour pork, cooked cabbage and chicken. Of course there was rice as well. It was pretty good. Jenna didn't eat much but she was so tense from Tianemen Square that I think she just wasn't hungry.
It's opening night at the new and improved Salon Kitty, and the SS girls find themselves thigh-deep in Nazi cock right out of the gate. In a sequence replete with whips, chains, irregular dildos, stockings, cigarettes, garters, champagne and spanking, the neophyte whores do an excellent job establishing their floozy street cred. Well, not quite, an SS girl turned undercover hooker named Susan (Rosemarie Lindt), the owner of the shapeliest backside in all of Nazi Germany, did screw up when she decided to laugh at a general's predilection for frilly pink underwear (whores, undercover or otherwise, should always try to refrain from mocking the fetishes of their clients).
We have a brand new sticky tape online too. We had received a few emails saying that all our tapes seemed rather autumnal and wintery and would we consider a spring/summer tape. Why yes, we would! So here is the outcome... "Boo & The Butterfly" is a very pretty tape, that is thinner than our usual. It's 36mm wide and its 66meters long which is certainly more than enough for all your taping desires! I've been taping things up that don't even need taping just as an excuse to use it! Is anyone starting to think that Boo is stealing the show?
* Suitable from birth to 15kg
Christmas pine scent makes me happy.
Another destination to settle in for the night is Pi Bar, home of great pizza pies and a small but worthy tap list (all dozen pints are always $5). They open at 3:14 p.m. and a slice of cheese is always $3.14. Double that and they’ll include whatever the beer of the day is.
Lotsa interesting differences in these 'uns...some small (hard to see Dagwood sleeping on the right side of the bed 'stead of the left) and some big (the "Baby Dumpling" ones show an interesting child-strip quality to 'em that reminds me of many of the kid comics of the day and even beyond), but for a guy like me who still retains at least an inkling of love 'n respect for the olde timey comic strips long gone 'n forgotten (and, in the case of BLONDIE not so) I really liked zoning back to the days when comics like these really meant a whole lot more to people because there frankly was a whole lot less stuff out there to get excited about! It's interesting to see the origins of a whole lotta running gags from neighborhood kids walking in on Dagwood in the tub to Dagwood's relationship with boss Mr. Dithers, who actually comes off rather nice in these early strips compared to the raging tyrant he would eventually become! I guess being exposed to a wastrel like Dagwood'd make even Gandhi wanna bop him a few after awhile, but at one time it seems as if Dithers was the kinda boss one would really yearn for!
Still this is the keyboard I play most often at home. It's all over Henning Goes To The Movies. I dig it.
- Raphael Saadiq 9:00 p.m. Los Angeles CA Rock
Akhee Ahn : My bandmates already told everything... I was a big fan of 60's garage music, but I want to localize this kind of music. And I don't want to stuck in the time of 60's. cos we're the people of 21st century. I love 60's garage (The Sonics, The Seeds, etc) and 70's Korean rock (Shin Jung Hyun, Kim Jung Mi, Kim Choo Ja, Mujigae Quintet, etc) and Japanese GS (The spiders, The Tempters, The Carnabeats, Lind and Linders, etc). Oh, too many to say. Originally I was in a psychobilly band, so I think it's time to play the melody of East Asia.
Crystal accuracy can vary depending on external temperature, and the tolerance of the crystal itself. This in turn will affect the accuracy of your millis result. Anecdotal experience has reported the drift in timing accuracy can be around three or four seconds per twenty-four hour period. If you are using a board or your own version that is using a ceramic resonator instead of a crystal, note that they are not as accurate and will introduce the possibility of higher drift levels. If you need a much higher level of timing accuracy, consider specific timer ICs such as the Maxim DS3231.
- No, but it was expensive. And it's Le Creuset.
Here's a new skirt I made back at the beginning of July. It's my take on the high wasit trend seen on shorts and jeans. I might make some shorts or wide legged pants with a similar waist, if I ever find fabric I'd like to make them out of. The waistband on this skirt is high, thick, fitted, and has four little buttons in an upside-down trapezoid shape. I'll wear it again soon and have some better pictures up, but I was spending the day with my friend there since this is right before I moved back from my hometown to my college town.
Not even tears.
Anywho, I even got a "thats cute" from the bf when I wore this outfit which is actually amazing haha, it looked better in person though, sometimes photos come out weird, plus it was super windy....and Im rambling....
FAME CHild & Development Center in partnership with UFSC-Puget Sound Chapter and JPMorgan Chase presents:
Good morning to you all. Yesterday passed in a whirl and Juli looked wonderful in her gown and hood. The procession of graduands were piped into the hall which made for a very moving scene. Here she is just after the ceremony:
this is a wonderful chance.
Now for my project for today, I have made another Winter layout:
I grabbed the phone from her and said something stupid like, "He's one of the 10 most important people in advertising."
The 2012 race was on. The women in my family have been scheming in secret because the 138th Kentucky Derby isn’t just about the Thoroughbreds this year: it’s about who is going to come up with the best, most creative, most outlandish hat.
Unless the Israelis conclude they must attack Iran’s nuclear facilities, it’s my opinion they will acquire nuclear parity. Despite their bellicosity, the Iranian leadership prefers to use the Palestinians and other Arabs as proxy fighters. Even with nuclear parity they live in a neighborhood where everyone else has nukes; China, Russia, Pakistan, and India have nukes and, of course, Israel.. The U.S. could deliver a nuke with ease.
They smell heavenly.
PACER’s National Bullying Prevention Center, a partner in The Bully Project and a supporter of Lee Hirsch’s new documentary “Bully,” offers educators, students, families and individuals the tools they need to address bullying in schools. By downloading free resources at PACER.org/bullying, communities can find ways to help change the culture of bullying.
Even saints need candy.
in the light spring rain.
We don't have a big enough yard.
Young black males do have to contend with police profiling, Cosby said. But he quoted Earl Lloyd, the first black player in the National Basketball Association, who said that his mother would question him closely when he came home about where he had been and with whom. “She’d tell him, ‘If you’re not in the picture, you can’t be framed.’”
I love Red. Probably because I love the University of Utah who is known for their bright red. Go Utes!
Take your time to read it...
Number of days I have off in a row starting today = 4!!!
Less than 10: Unfortunately, you are clearly not in control of the financial aspects of the business, and you are operating at a very high level of risk. You should not be shocked if the business fails.
I love my family (though it is a complicated love.)
My Dad and his two boys, Tom & Tyler are back at Wildwood Stables in Arcadia National Park, Maine. They will be there throughout the summer giving guided carriage tours through the park. If you get there, be sure to ask for "the old Cowboy". He will give you an awesome ride through that beautiful area with incredible views of the Atlantic ocean.
So... what's the goss? I suppose I'd better tell you mine first. The new novel is coming along, slowly but surely. Part of the reason I was in Cornwall was for a research trip - the whole family were there at first and we investigated various places I want to write about (she said cryptically), and then they all buggered off home, leaving me in a cottage, writing furiously for three days. It is amazing how much work you can get done when you don't have the distractions of children, housework, Facebook etc. I wrote 18,000 words in three days! So that was a bit of a result. I felt so LONELY by the end of it though, I was desperate to see my kids and husband, absolutely aching to see them, if that doesn't sound too melodramatic. We had a lovely reunion on the platform at Bath train station though, children flinging themselves at me from all angles, awwww... Five minutes later, I was telling them off about something, but you know, it was nice while it lasted!
I can haz cookies?
I got to wear something Very Special, too, because the day before I got a parcel in the mail... something I'd bought myself, but Loni from Love To Love You wrapped it up nicely with a little card and everything so it really felt like a birthday present. From me. Thankyou, me - I love it!
Release Date: October 4, 2011
When I began work, early last year, on the novella that would eventually become Improper Relations, I was hoping to push myself. Throw out the rule book. Write a story that stretched—even demolished—the limits I’d been setting for myself as a writer.
If the council does not raise the rates, the Government will install a commissioner who will.
I ratchet up your income tax.
It was when the mother buffalo walked off for the last time that I looked up and saw a lioness peering through the bushes. I have no doubt she had been watching this scene play out for a while, and was just waiting for the herd to move off before making her approach.
Below are a few resources we've found useful so far. I will post more of our honey journey once we've set up the hives!
i've been having a hard time putting my thoughts into words lately. with emily's 5th birthday swiftly approaching, i've been feeling sad. feeling sad mostly, i think, because she is growing up so fast, but also, because i'm afraid of what we're missing. with her delays, she's not doing what a typically developing child does. she doesn't play with dolls or do hubby's hair. when we go shopping, she doesn't help me pick out her clothes. she doesn't play with toys that a 5 year old would play with. this has been a very difficult time for me. are we going to miss doing all of these mommy/daughter things? will they just pass us by?? i don't know, and that sucks. i'm so proud of how far she's come in the last couple of years. i need to remember her accomplishments instead of dwelling on things that may never be.
8:30-- Get home, write post, relax. Go to bed too late... AGAIN.
Ready to blast daddy
Bill’s drawings of dogs, snakes, cats, chickens and mules demonstrate his love of animals. Another drawing is of a lively-speaking preacher with arms outstretched toward worshipers gathered in a circle. A simple, yet powerful drawing that provides more detail about his life on the farm.
After cleaning up from the removal of the air conditioners it spurred a whole cleaning and sorting spree. Brian and I really enjoy rearranging and trying to find the best way to utilize our space.
I'm okay with characters who have knowledge I don't have. Particle physicists are allowed to be particle physicists. But I do expect their mental resources to coexist with a predictable level of general common sense, and for those mental resources to be affected by the physical stresses of their surroundings. If a woman who has studied for years in a magic school suddenly makes a stupid beginner mistake with her magic, I would really like to know why. Does she have a knife in her leg? That could be a good reason. Has she been startled? That's possible. If she's sitting in a place of calm, though, and I can't see any reason for the mistake, I'm going to be skeptical.
Lesson of the story. Be careful of what you say to others, it might not mean anything to you but it could mean the world to someone else. As much as possible, I like to build people up, there's too much negativity in this world and sometimes an encouraging word or a show of appreciation really does go a long way.
It goes far beyond this relatively harmless specteral horseplay, though, as the spirit of Otami the slain woman enters into Laura's body for brief moments, just long enough to make a suggestive comment to her husband's best friend, planting a seed of lust in his mind.
Body and soul
LOST VEGAS is the third original novel I've self-published this summer. Here's how that happened:
There is also some ribbons too (Forgot to include them in the pics)
September 28: After the great success of our August 10 showcase, Saviya once again returns with another great show featuring live music by the talented Fernan Cobian and a lineup of superb dancers including Ritchie, Najma, Taji and Evvie! This will be a night of fantastic music and dancing you won’t want to miss so come on down and be part of this great Shimmyshowcase experience.
Second Letter
I am definately not one for praying the exact prayer over and over again but the following prayer definately contains some of the biggest struggles Christians face though we wouldn’t want to admit it. Read and consider the following prayer.
Traditionally, December is the month where publishing starts to quiet down as editors get ready to be away for the holidays. Kind of like how August tends to be an unofficial slow down period that then picks up after Labor Day.
And then please include either our book brief descriptions, a brief word of promo, or a link for people to FIND more if they want to (all related info below).
Since you took your love away
"Interface" works better as "talk with"
4th place overall which was okay but I should of had an extra Gel or something on the second to last climb as I was feeling it near the end.
Are there any items you would be able to do without? Those little niceties that you think you ‘need’ to buy but can in fact either make at home, buy second hand, or not buy at all? Not only would they declutter your life, they would leave more cash in your purse.
SO it comes the time when we are kitted with our staff cards, and I’m well aware on any sort of picture day, that you have to be on point. The face you see on the card is one that will potentially haunt you for the rest of your professional career.
Does Section 2 require a specific request for a financial advantage, in order for the person making that request, to commit an offence?
The people who signed the letter stressed it was a very important letter because they were not just people who did not like the cuts, they were economists.
I love all the treats.
400g fresh strawberries
Rome´s Enemies 4: Spanish Armies
In the second part, we are given real and practical ways to “sharpen” our children into this mission-minded arrows. Ferwerda continues to call parents to make whatever changes necessary to see this eternal mission come to center stage. “Raising arrows isn’t just another formula to follow or another list of to-dos. It’s a mentality, a lifestyle, and a change of priorities that permeates the whole family’s lives and schedules, centering everyone on God’s priorities and plans (54).” She also provides real-life examples of families who have determined to be on mission together and the variety of ways they do so. As Ferwerda’s children go to public school and the Harris family have homeschooled, One Million Arrows reveals ways families can become mission-focused regardless of their schooling choice. The focus here is on practical insights from a variety of families that relate to wherever you are as a parent. Just like “Papa,” Ferwerda also calls us to think outside our natural families to investing in other children as part of the mission. In her words, “I think investing in other kids is one of the best ways to get our kids spiritually and emotionally engaged in this aspect of the mission (75).”
..I showed the List to my girlfriend.
Then the doors opened and it was non-stop until closing. We were flooded with request from Lafayette’s most passionate beer drinkers for a taste of our biere. I know we had come close to perfection of our LA-31 recipe when so many people took a taste and requested a second or third glass before giving up their place in line. We had a large number of tasters come back with their own, larger cup for savoring.
TD: Ah.
I heard about your separation and I am sorry. I don’t know the details, (and I don’t need to) but I wanted you to know I am praying for you and your family. My heart breaks for you and I pray for the best possible outcome.
I’m looking forward to seeing you go further, and I’m hoping/praying and want to encourage you not to let it hold you back. Churchill’s “black dog” didn’t stop him winning the war. So if he can beat Hitler, you’re in good company.
This programme fulfills the industry need for graduates who understand the world of e commerce and web marketing. It has been developed by and is delivered in conjunction with key professionals from this Industry.
However, his perineometer was never marketed effectively and there was a widespread misconception that Kegels could not be performed without it. In the 1970s, more sensitive electromyography (EMG) perineometers became available for those with severely debilitated pelvic muscles.
Narvasa, C.J., Puno and Vitug, JJ., took no part.
The ESDC, which initially said that utility work in the AY footprint would last three months, expands the timetable to 14 months, with no explanation.
Love the Lord, all His saints! The Lord preserves the faithful, but the proud He pays back in full. Be strong and take heart, all you who hope in the Lord.
OK listen: if I’m feeling nice I might write something using the ol’ pen and paper while I’m away - but don’t expect anything to be uploaded until Sunday.
The torch probably gave enough light to banish the worst effects of the darkness on his Clearsight. Rel stepped forward, pushing back into his Gift, fighting down the shiver of nerves. The Wilder opposite didn't actually move, but Rel clearly saw caution brace its stance. He said, "I'm acting on a Clearviewing I had two weeks ago. You've taken a human captive here?"
3:00 - 3:30 welcome, prayer, message
The so-called funding ratio has been less than 100 percent since 2001. Because the ratio is "smoothed" by averaging three years of investment returns to minimize volatility, the latest gap only partially reflects the almost 24 percent net gain from investments in fiscal 2011, according to the report. The system earned 2.3 percent on assets in the past calendar year, according to a January study.
Big hugs Emma x
Naturally, the way to deal with fiscal urgency is to treat everyone like a suspect. Befera has dismissed criticism from privacy groups, wrapping himself up in a blanket of duty and righteousness–’desperate times call for desperate measures’ and all that nonsense.
½ tsp jeera (cumin seeds)
i had a life
The main questions being discussed: Does the monkey get the copyright? If not, does anyone?
I wanted to try the Chanel Vitalumière Aqua Foundation for a while now, people just talk about it like it’s the most beautiful thing for your face. It’s quite pricey and that’s why I never decided to get it. A few weeks ago I saw that Chanel has just released the compact version of that particular foundation, so it’s a cream. I prefer cream type foundations because they usually give you extra coverage, so then I went for it.
I ironed my outfit and gathered my pearls. I found my hankies and polished my tiara.
She is an older Mom by most standards and perhaps this is what gives her the tools to be so proficient - a little maturity, and time to read everything ever written about babies and digest it , all the while weeding out the nonsense and tempering it with her own instincts.
However, I could not find it.
Like there is no other way
And all of this just brings me back to a question that seems to keep coming up in my life lately: what, exactly, constitutes success? If you're using test scores as your criteria, then those 12 young unschoolers who participated in the study are failures. But if your criteria are different, if instead you're looking--actually looking, not just marking tests and studying at a distance--for things like passion, joy, involvement, curiosity, excitement, learning, then I'm quite sure your results are going to look very different.
Another thought in selecting fly fishing rods is that the action of the rod or flex, full flex rods are sensitive and offers a much better feel for the fish, however are short on casting distance, a stiffer rod can permit longer distance casts however can sacrifice the sensitivity. In things of serious wind, quick flowing rivers and ocean fishing a quick action stiff fly rod is your best bet.
We finished it Tuesday then Weds I started to get the tree ready to go out. It looked like a Christmas bomb went off in our house Weds night....lol Today "Thursday" I finished getting it all packed up I had to buy one more Christmas tote. But its so organized now, so happy! Here is the pics I snapped and thought I share the way I am storing Christmas items so next year maybe It will be little easier.
This given task is noble as the message it contains
About 30 protesters were arrested over the course of the day for mostly minor charges, ranging from resisting arrest to blocking street traffic, reports the New York Daily News. Confrontations were scattered around the city. There was a skirmish on the Lower East Side with masked protesters who may not be part of the main Occupy group.
You need to be able to keep spirits high towards the end of the week. People realise the end is starting to get near and their holiday shall soon be drawing to an end. The last day where you are driving back to where you started, you can almost feel the coach being drawn inwards by the minds of returning to a usual life. Having to cook and clean and do everything as usual, not being waited on hand and foot like their holiday.
You must understand printing lies about Republican candidates is OK. It’s called “vetting.” Printing the truth about liberals – that’s called “swift-boating.” From career MSNBC jock sniffer Keith Olbermann to Barney Frank’s favorite publisher Jann Wenner, the verdict on Palin is unanimous.
However , it is possible to consider couple of items purchasing it. The most important thing is to decide where precisely you may operate your RC car : on road or even from the road? The actual driving cars would generally run smooth on the streets, however not at all on gemstones, grass or hillsides. For this objective, you will have to purchase the off road version.
You want to know wich resolution is the right for you? check this chart:
typhoid influenza
“So stay at that keyboard and on my behalf
我们所有的经验
Him: Great. Noon. Mexican place uphill.
All the papers are from a digi set called 'Think Pink' by Just so Scrappy. I love them for so many girly cards but they were designed for these. I decided to put faux stitching around all the edges to give the different papers a bit more definition. I used MFT Die-namics large ric-rac die for the wavy band. I made the flowers with a Joy Craft die and the tiny foliage is a Marriane D die.
well as all corrupt doctors-gone, arrested and taken away. Stock
Qualities are insurmountable barriers for us; we cannot help feeling that mere quantitative differences are something fundamentally distinct from quantity, namely that they are qualities which can no longer be reduced to one another. But everything for which the word "knowledge" makes any sense refers to the domain of reckoning. weighing, measuring, to the domain of quantity; while, on the other hand, all our sensations of value (i.e., simply our sensations) adhere precisely to qualities, i.e., to our perspective "truths" which belong to us alone and can by no means be "known"! It is obvious that every creature different from us senses different qualities and consequently lives in a different world from that in which we live. Qualities are an idiosyncrasy peculiar to man; to demand that our human interpretations and values should be universal and perhaps constitutive values is one of the hereditary madnesses of human pride.
And He (Allah swt) said:
What I think about this card now: If you stare at Luzinski, without knowing him, he looks like a bad guy in one of those '80s movies about teenage kids in the '50s.
Merry Meet!
All this is to say that I am not exactly in a position to write an unbiased review, but Hisham is a masterful writer in addition to being a singularly lovely person. His second novel, like his first, deals with a Libyan father's forced disappearance and the repercussions for his son and his young wife. The boy, who is at the cusp of manhood, is in love with his stepmother, and they are just close enough in age to make the sudden absence of his father fraught with sexual tension in addition to the obvious distress. The characters are flawed and philosophical, and their story unfolds like a dream as they try to grasp the reality of their hijacked lives.
1 soon
While circumstances do vary and the ideal isn't always possible, I believe it is by divine design that the role of motherhood emphasizes the nurturing and teaching of the next generation. We see so many challenges today from distracting and destructive influences intended to mislead God's children. We are seeing many young people who lack the deep spiritual roots necessary to remain standing in faith as storms of unbelief and despair swirl around them. Too many of our Father in Heaven's children are being overcome by worldly desires. The onslaught of wickedness against our children is at once more subtle and more brazen than it has ever been. Teaching the gospel of Jesus Christ in the home adds another layer of insulation to protect our children from worldly influences." - Elder L. Tom Perry, General Conference Address, Ensign May 2010, pp. 30-31.
Libby came to live with us back in September 2004. She was a rescue dog. We never really knew how old she was and knew nothing of her background. She is the first dog I ever really had that was mine. Libby really took me by surprise as I never consider myself a “dog” person but she loved me and taught me so much about unconditional love. She made herself right at home in our house and in our hearts. Our time with her was shorter than we thought it would be. But I’m so glad she was ours for that time.
"We’re National, the Sunshine Airline. Watch us Shine."- National Airlines
We had been warned that Saturday 28th would see a large demonstration in Kuala Lumpur for free and fair elections in Malaysia. Thousands of people gathered in the city for a peaceful protest, the finalé of which resulted in the crowd storming the barricades to Merdaka Square, where they had originally planned to rally but had been banned by the city council at the last moment. This was met with force by the police who fired water cannon and tear gas to make the crowd disperse.
7. Sometimes I Feel Like a Motherless Child
'Her finely touched spirit had still its fine issues, though they were not widely visible. Her full nature, like that river of which Cyrus broke the strength, spent itself in channels which had no great name on the earth. But the effect of her being on those around her was incalculably diffusive: for the growing good of the world is partly dependent on unhistoric acts; and that things are not so ill with you and me as they might have been, is half owing to the number who lived faithfully a hidden life, and rest in unvisited tombs.'
* the opportunities for growth I've been offered-- and the courage to be crazy enough to take them. For details, see bullets 1-3. :)
(Incidentally, another great moment has the family going down to the river for a swim. Mitya sits on a blanket, taking off his shoes and speaking bitterly with his old flame, Marusia. At the same time, he watches as Kotov, standing in the grass, takes off his shoes. A green broken bottle lies just inches from Kotov's bare feet. It's a great moment for building the tension between the two men.)
And many of you guys know about the White House Kitchen Garden. We’re going to go down there and harvest with our kids in a few minutes. But I still remember last year when we started the whole process, and we involved kids from local schools from the very beginning. They helped us till the soil. They helped us plant. They helped us weed. They helped us harvest. They ate. It was pretty powerful.
Here is the picture that I had a chance to color yesterday afternoon. I drew the black line work while at Anime Expo in July, and I've been waiting for a chance to color it in. I love doing demos! It gives me a chance to color and chat with so many neat people. Stop by today to see what new artwork I'll be coloring. Have a great week, and I hope you find some inspiration from my work.
48. “The Bride” in “The Bride of Frankenstein” is the only one of Universal Studios’ Classic Monsters to have never killed anyone.
There was a dash of disappointment all around that there was only one baby in there. Don't get me wrong one is amazing, but they did put two in there and knowing that one didn't make it is a little bit hard. There were so many signs point to twins so it really was a shock to me.
Simply flavored with olive oil and onions, and served with a salad, this made a fantastic light dinner. I did mine a little different than Dorie, since I have a friend from Spain and her tortilla is surperb, I followed her directions. I sliced the potatoes instead of cubing them, and cooked them very slowly in olive oil. If you want that smooth creamy texture this is not a process that can be rushed, but it is definitely worth the time.
Another great contest last week was the one posted by Jim McCarthy of Dystel & Goderich in which the D&G blogowers were asked to submit and choose the best first sentence from an unpublished YA or MG manuscript. Check out the top nine and some fascinating discussion here:
wild fruit infusion, fresh cheese ice cream
How long have you got? Swallows and Amazons, probably, but also the Narnia books and Winnie the Pooh. If we’re talking younger than that: Asterix, Each Peach Pear Plum, The Jolly Postman, Brambley Hedge, Tim and Charlotte, Captain Pugwash…
losing control
WHAT'S KAMBOZZA LIKE?
Direct and frank communication is not the norm in Kenya. Messages will always be delivered in a senstive way. Protecting people’s face, image and relationship is more important. If the relationship is intimate the communication style will become more direct. For newly established and more formal relationships, diplomacy will be of utmost importance.
Once Bitten, Twice Shy revolves around a smart, sassy, reckless, paranoid, kick-ass, crazy and dangerous, female character Jasmine Parks. At the beginning of the novel, Jaz is re-assigned to the top assassin in the CIA, a 291 years old vampire named Vayl. She doesn’t know why she is re-assigned. They are sent after six months to do a recon mission in Miami, but it never is simple.
01-Dennis Walks-Don't Play That Song
Mrs Youngest sent a thank you email to everone:-
I took the seam out so it lay sort of flat and used the extra fabric to fill in where it didn't completely cover.
I used an embossing pen to go over some of the sections on top and bottom papers and embossed with black embossing powder.
Do you believe in life-long learning? I do - but it is difficult to get children to understand what it means. So this card is dedicated to the whole philosophy that we continue to learn new things all our lives. I have used my favourite saying and there is a hidden message there. Can you see it?
Kucinich
For Health & Safety Professionals seeking opportunities in Exploration & Production, please contact ron.nickelson@clovergs.com.
ROSIE'S SETBACKS
5" x 6.25" Card Recipe:
Cardstock: PTI - Rustic Cream
A sudden and uniform breath swept through the stands – few can say they have laid eyes on such a wild animal, let alone to be close enough to hear its heavy paws pounding the ground with indignant impenitence. People prepared to flee from the terror filling their veins, but found themselves glued to their seats. curiously and cautiously the bolts of the cage were removed and the beast leap from its prison with an aggravated growl. The intimidating cat began tracking around the circular stage, tossing up which stand it should eat first. As the anxiety grew to an almost insufferable level, a small spherical trapezoid was placed calmly in the middle of the scene and with a whisper of a command from top hatted man, the seemingly wild beast slinked sulkily over to its place and stood on the coloured block.
2) Go inside Ranva and head to the northwest-most house where you'll see a female monk just like in picture 2. Talk to her. She was one of the mercenaries sent out to recover the safe, but they got greedy, beat her up and ran off with the iron safe.
sponsors have sponsored for this hop.
I am deeply humbled and honored beyond words to be included with this group of outstanding human beings.
Sunday was supposed to be painless.
"Michael!" Their father put his arms out to the sides, shielding Sam and Abby. "Put down that gun. You idiot!"
It’s this.
It's strange that not too long ago I was worried about GFC and losing all my followers. I was so consumed and worried that I would be forgotten. Funny how none of that seems to matter anymore!
demanded the sum of N5
But Andrews conceded his anti-loitering measure might well not have helped with either the Silver Spring rumble or the Germantown flash-robbing. Along with the drop in crime statistics in Montgomery County that he’s happy to tout, Andrews’ anti-loitering bill seems superfluous, and driven merely, as he put it, by “concern that there is a need for legislation like this.” Delegate Ana Sol Gutierrez (on hand to talk about the Maryland redistricting debacle) added that she was concerned that this law would provide yet another opportunity for “Secure Communities” to collect fingerprints and deport harmless, undocumented Hispanic immigrants.
"I'm glad Rock On did it, 'cause you just went anywhere you wanted after that, it was so unusual." And that's what David Essex did. The follow-up hit, Lamplight, featured a middle eight that sounded like the soundtrack to a Josephine Baker routine; his first album also included the dry, driving Streetfight, a pop precis of A Clockwork Orange that was later sampled by Massive Attack.
To always make mistakes.
Clothing Design and Styling – Sebastian Couture (Sebastian Couture)
People often think of the stages as lasting weeks or months. They forget that the stages are responses to feelings that can last for minutes or hours as we flip in and out of one and then another. We do not enter and leave each individual stage like getting on and off a train. We may feel one, then another and back again to the first one.
I loved it and made a typical Karin card:
So I will have to ease back just a bit online if I hope to complete my third and final book. I’ll probably skip a post now and then. I’ll have to scale back how many blogs I visit in a day. There aren’t enough hours to do it all.
Today Maisie had chocolate peanut butter on wheat heart sandwiches, raisins, half of a clementine and a strawberry jelly.
METHOD
Gently heat two cups of milk, be careful how they warm,
Ker Farking Ching!
I have to be honest at the time my fiance wasent helping me at all, i was soooooooo down the only time i was ok and forgeting about all our problems and i felt like the teenage women i was, was when i was in his company.
When you see a plant name that has another genus name in its species name (are you confused yet?) you can probably conclude that the one plant looks like the other one. This is Aloe haworthoides (go back two days and look at all the Haworthia).
Filming is well underway on the new Star Trek film in the franchise’s ‘reboot series’. Renound actor Benedict Cumberbatch has been cast as a big bad villain in the new film, and recent filming reports show photos of the Sherlock star shooting a fight scene between his character and Spock (played by Zachary Quinto, Heroes) and Lieutenant Uhura (played by Zoe Saldana, Avatar).
Banana Bread ~ for blog's first anniversary
Anyone that can look at that list and predict a rousingly successful presidency is so optimistic that Pollyana is calling you a nutcase to your face.
So it was that I found myself recently striding to the door of Montana – the newest, hippest bar/club in all of Pareeee.
Recent studies by WHO and UNICEF have shown that diarrhea is the second leading killer of children below 5 years in the Philippines and worldwide. In the Philippines, more than 13 Filipino children die from diarrhea everyday. This accounts for at least 12% of deaths among children under 5 in the country. And the most common cause of vomiting and diarrhea in children worldwide is Rotavirus.
The night is soft indeed, with not a sough of wind. Gentle, gentle. Over by the church across the field, from the hidden slopes of Trelystan Dingle I hear the muted yelp of a fox. Behind me in the dark conifers of Badnage Wood is the whispery whoot of a tawny owl. Oh, this is pretty good; the cries of the night; the scent of the garden, green, earth and sweet peas.
BF: WHAT?!
So I've now added bright and oxidised 2 inch sterling silver ball and hammered headpins in 20g/0.8mm, 22g/0.6mm and 24g/0.5mm.
Registering is free and easy and shouldn't take you more than 5 minutes to complete. It is really easy, you just need to supply basic information about yourself so that we can register you and begin sending you surveys.
the living room and the kitchen.
Answer: Here’s my minimal answer: Minimalism means living with less. What I mean by that is minimalism is living in a more intentional way, avoiding the clutter of life so you can focus on the important things in life.
But it has been a couple of years since I pulled on the lycra and pushed the peddles.
**Sew into place above pocket, sew buttons to pocket.
¾ cup whole wheat flour
— Led Zeppelin
To his puzzled disciples the Master later said,
Robert C. Sibley apparently grew up I n Alberta and the Yukon and some of his earliest jobs were in the territory. In 1970 he had a job in construction that required him to drive the Carcross Road regularly and be mesmerized by Emerald Lake. By 1976 he was employed by a mining company doing some exploration near Ross River and was left alone in a bush camp for days at a time. In 1977 he went to work at the Whitehorse Star. This is the year I began scribbling for the paper, so we probably shared space in the odd edition or two.
A few things happened in the last week, or so, that have caused me to pause, think, and then remain silent. It has taken years for me to realize that a knee jerk response should not be vocalized. And, unfortunately, although the lesson has been heard, it still isn’t always heeded. Maybe that’s why I love the written word. Overzealous reactions can be edited out later when the head is cooler and I think I’m calm enough now. But, before I get to the situation I’m, obviously, still avoiding let me give you a few examples of how my vocal skills have created problems in the past.
I'm excited! not even for Christmas but for HOME! I can't believe I grew up here wanting to leave. As I got older I knew it was a great place to have a family and living somewhere else had confirmed that for me. It's home, and nothing can ever change that for me.
is concerned.
and ask why?
Hi, sweets! This is my second post for today, and I'm planning to write one more tomorrow morning (which will be still Saturday in the Northern Hemisphere), as I have a finished card waiting to be blogged since Friday :)
shot of Worcestershire
Today we went to a local farm with a lovely farm shop and cafe. The boy had delicious ice cream (yes, it was a very cold day but hey ho) and we fed chickens and played in the sandpit for hours. It was so lovely - I felt a bit sad that he didn't have any company his own size, but we had a great time anyway and the rest of our week will be quite busy and sociable. I guess that will be less of a worry as his little sister races to become a more active playmate, too!
I know right? Betty Martha doesn't eat soup!
“What about all the highlights you’re missing?” I asked him.
Megg: I mainly hang out on Facebook. I kind of live there. Is that weird? ;)
Shallots, 5 pcs, cut thinly
Meanwhile, the international community shunned South Africa -- but not Saudi Arabia, a theocracy where converts from Islam face capital punishment; or East Germany, where people who tried to leave the country were shot dead; or Kampuchea, where Pol Pot perpetrated a genocide of more than 1 million people. Only South Africa, where less than 2,000 blacks were killed by a government faced with guerrilla warfare, was subjected to UN sanctions -- but not Angola, where civil war killed hundreds of thousands.
5. Saw control is greatly decreased for accurate cutting.
rice
This morning, there was another beautiful song in my head when I woke up. Let Go by Imogen Heap. It's been slipping into my mind all day. Slipping in there in the middle of a design calculation or while talking to a client, reminding me not to worry.
here they are :
A few plans for the rest of the week...school, Boy Scouts, baking and laundry. Just living our daily life and focusing in on thankfulness each and every day.
No investigation or action has been initiated against the police officers responsible for her torture. On the contrary, Superintendent of Police Ankit Garg, named in Sori’s letters, was awarded a Gallantry Medal on Republic Day, 2012. Sori’s petition before the Supreme Court asking to be transferred out of Chhattisgarh has been subjected to repeated delays and is still pending. Her health continues to deteriorate in the meantime.
The Mouse will watch you, learning your habits, learning when to gnaw and when to hide. And in the quiet time of sleep, you may hear him in the distance, chewing away, carving a more suitable path for himself, through your walls and barriers. Soon, they will become weak, crumble, and you will know that he has made your walls his home.
AdriN2001: hey Mare
It’s finals week here at law school and as usual for this time of year, I hate my life. I did better at actually paying attention in class this semester, and while I’m studying as hard as I can given the circumstances, I remember immersing myself much more during 1L fall and before that, in undergrad. I just don’t care. The best part of law school, to me, is everything OUTSIDE of class–like getting elected president of the Black Law Students Association. So I study just as much as I need to get a decent grade. My apathy really hit me in my exam yesterday. Normally I read and re-read my outlines until I have them damn near memorized. I didn’t do that much for my Domestic Relations final and there were a couple of questions where I thought, If I had studied harder I’d know this pat, but I just shrugged it off. The professor allowed us a one page cheat sheet and mine had plenty of white space on it because I used margins and refused to go lower than 9.5pt font–I wasn’t interesting in working that hard for an answer. My classmates had eliminated all margins and crammed an entire outline on one page in 5pt font O_O I looked at their notes and thought, Clearly I’m doing this wrong.
“Dogs don’t get tired of the same old thing like we do, Mrs. Archer. He’ll be fine, I promise.”
The wooden rails had to go, though, that was a given.The back came off too, with inside some faded velours .
The team leader had cornered her in the hall that first day and said, “New teachers do not get a say in team decisions we make. Is that understood?”
Dear future grandkids, this is your Gran-Pappy speaking and I just want you to know that this is a Big day in your family history!
* What do I miss the most? You – all of you out in blog land. I wonder every day how you’re all doing, and what’s going on in your lives. I absolutely hate the idea that I’m missing out on your adventures, and I’m determined to find a way to get back to the blogosphere somehow. I’m still thinking audio blogs are the way to go, but I’m not sure I have the technical knowledge to make it happen. Maybe in the meantime, we should work out a schedule: I’ll assign you each a day and time to call me during my long commute and you can read me your blogs! Yeah, yeah, I know you’re all busy too, but really, isn’t it all about me?
Joshua Wood(s)
Put a Process In Place
And all along the pathways, echoing between the trees,
So I asked her what she thought of it. Said I'd seen the thing about it on 20-20, but obviously didn't tell her this was a subject I knew a lot about. She said all her girl friends were talking about it so she had to check it out. She said said she knew nothing about the lifestyle and said it was "out there'' and "graphic'' but didn't seem negative about it.
~I love you
pioneers had to do!
After a while they get separated from the group. The C&D is build a little higher than the beach, so there is a kind of wall, where one can easily sit, listen to the music and be a little far from the real party. They where talking and laughing for hours without noticing the time running. Slowly it became twilight and the sky turns from black to greyish blue. The Persian Princess and Prince Charming where still chatting, sitting next to each other on the wall in front of the C&D. Not such an asshole as i thought. The next moment when they where laughing it happened. This small touch of their skins: For a second her shoulder touches his arm. For a second she could feel his soft and warm skin. A little surprised they looked at each others eyes, only for a second. Oh no, now he will think that i wanna have sex with him tonight, or he will try to kiss me, i don´t want that, i don´t wanna kiss this guy. As he could read her mind he looked away and changed his position, so that there was a little more space between them now. „Do you wanna walk with me at the beach? I know a nice place where we can watch the sunrise.“ He asked out of the blue. „No thanks, I don´t wanna have sex with you!“, was all what the Persian Princess answered. I didn´t asked you for sex, he said with a cheeky smile in his face, so that´s what is in your head when you look at me?
2 T peanut oil
The Seriake Dickson administration has however vowed it would not procure the new vehicles as presented to the administration and ordered that the carted vehicles be returned by ex-political appointees or face the wrath of the law.
And in Non-Integrity Commission news….Silk Man Reginald Armour apparently didn’t realise that there’d a be a conflict of interest with him investigating Gladys de Badiss Gafoor and remaining as legal counsel to President Fete to de I-Max Richards. So now he has to step down…I wonder if he sought legal advice on it?
Vincent Cangelosi, 30, New York, N.Y.
Oatmeal Stout - A variation of the traditional stout, this came about when people thought that adding oats to the brewing mix would make the beer healthier. The side bonus is that oatmeal stouts tend to be a litle sweeter than traditional stouts. What you get is a very silky-smooth beer that has a BIG taste, but doesn't feel like you should have to chew it.
NO! I want to get on with this update.
"No, Nanook. I think today, I'll have............let's see...... how about the number two special of the whale blubber breakfast sandwich. Oh...... could you make that three. I need one for Melvin, and that Polar Bear clinging to the roof of my car. He looks a little hungry."
Recipe Sources: The recipe for the Dutch Crunch topping came from Rose Levy Beranbaum’s The Bread Bible. The recipes for the breads we’ve suggested came from The Bread Bible and an adaptation of a recipe found on Baking Bites.
We are expecting some snow this week -- forecast is for 1 - 8 inches (that narrows it down). So if we have snow days I may or may not be in my cubicle, but if I am I will be taking pictures and posting them to my blog.
What a hopeful and uplifting read in this morning's New York Times: Fourteen year-old Julia Bluhm is unhappy about the Photoshopped images of young women in magazines, and is fighting back.
14 I Don't Wanna Be a Victim (live)
The “climax” of the film is a big sloppy mess that pretty much has ‘try-hard’ written all over it. They didn’t have any actual atmosphere or scares, so they put in a nearly unwatchable miasma of people screaming, demonic faces, flashy lights and other stuff that makes the movie look like a little kid screaming for attention because his mom and dad wouldn’t buy him a damn Optimus Prime action figure. Seriously, this is wretched. You have to TRY to be this bad!
Tajanee White a.k.a. Suga Plum
I spoke with hub more about it and we do have to put the kids first. A place where they can stay for a long time, be with their friends, play in their sports and activities and enjoy being in one place.
863 D-IX/2/1983. “To My Fellow Straussians: Words of Caution.” Claremont Institute for the Study of Statesmanship Panel, Annual Convention, American Political Science Association, Palmer House, Chicago, Illinois.
My daughter took this photo of her two girls, my darling twin granddaughters as they were walking home. She asked me if I would use the photo in a journaling page. And this is what I came up with.
Darkness like a carpet
I'm kind of obsessed with dulce de leche. In churros, on churros, on anything sweet! I think it's a slight obsession with sweetened condensed milk too....
Have you been enjoying all the sneaks from yesterday? We've got some amazingly talented designers on our Front Porch Kit team and they have created wonderful projects for this release. I haven't seen all the complete projects yet, but those I've seen are beautiful!
7. CM Punk defeated Chris Jericho with a GTS to retain the RAW title 10/10
And this is why I’ve started talking to my son about the student strikes currently taking place in my province. I want him to understand that it’s okay to protest, to gather together in a democratic fashion and stand up for what you believe in. That he’s lucky enough to live in a country where this behaviour is not only tolerated, but encouraged.
- 2 tsp. hot sauce
Capt. Gerald Francis Deconto, 44, Sandwich, Mass.
E is for Elegant. I am totally NOT elegant.
Farewell Topsails (UK…Humphrey Jennings)
prettier than this. Some proportions are off and I think the messy
And welcome back to my returning sponsors:
13. The Killer - All-Story Weekly 4 parts Apr 7, 14, 21, 28
I turns out that though we are here to hear Carol Ann Duffy discuss the book with her in the 'Carol Ann Duffy and Friends' series of events, this isn't going to happen. Duffy won't be here and Winterson will simply read and talk to us and take questions. The theatre fills up and there's an expectant hush as through the glass beyond the auditorium capsule we see her approach with her minders, and Winterson enters, all in preacher's black with white shirt and a touch of snakeoil saleman's gold on her brogues, and the whole place erupts in a kind of mass relief and excitement of applause. You almost expect her to bow or make the sign of the cross. And there are the acolytes speaking in the Q & A as if the Spirit has moved them: the first person to speak is a girl on the front row, who tells us in a voice trembling with emotion that she comes from Accrington (as Winterson does) and, honestly, it's like a kind of miracle, but she had never heard of Winterson before but this morning she opened the Guardian and read the article about her and it so moved her, so chimed with her own experience, that she came into town and bought Oranges, and - this is the honest truth - she was sitting reading it in Cornerhouse and someone commented to her that this event was on and here she is, and honestly, she feels it's changed her life... And another woman speaks from up in the balcony and says that as a gay writer Oranges simply saved her life... And at the end the applause goes on and on, and the queue for the book signing snakes round and round the Exchange foyer.
This is a further matter where Mr Bird is in disagreement with the prevailing public mood, but again, when expressing an opinion, it is very difficult to commit perjury.
Closer.
Read the guidelines in detail to see eligibility status and also take note to both the City Council’s deadline and Council Member James’. When applying for funding from Council Member James, we ask that you submit the OQF via the website by Friday, March 18, 2011 and the Non-City Capital Request via the Capital Funding Request website by Monday, March 28, 2011. In case your group is missing information and/or need to submit additional requirements, we urge you to adhere to our office deadlines. Any applications submitted after the New York City Council deadline will not be accepted and the website will prevent access. DO NOT MAIL PAPER FORMS.
immediately into my head flashed a life lesson from God.
However, after a few days, I realized that my statistics were missing in Webmaster Tools, Analytics, and Quantcast.
Anyway, here cometh the lesson…..
this feeling;
“Oh yes, there will be entertainment.” She answers.
Sitting on the left-hand side of the bed, she’d be next to the IV drip stand for the morphine, but leaning back against the wall unit, she could look out of the window and see the hills when she could no longer bear to look at Misha. To look at his face. Misha slept with his eyes open. The entire time. Like a plant, he had turned to the light, towards the grey but bright day. The technique is soon dropped, yet the motifs hinted at here continue and begin to dominate the content: light on walls, distance – physical and psychological – water for drinking and swimming in, and insects. Alice describes how, in her final days with Misha, a spider built a web between their two beers bottles which they had to destroy in order to share a drink. Later, questions about a dead relative are described as threads of spider webs broken as soon as one seeks an answer. Back in the present, Alice moves close to the hospital and notes that she can see his room from her window: "Misha's there. And we're here". In the second story, she lies in Conrad’s empty bed and watches a spot of light on the wall, realising Conrad would have seen it too. In the next story, there is more light on another bedroom wall and then later, as Alice travels to Richard’s Berlin home, she thinks: "In a room in that apartment in this house on this street, a man I know is dying. Everyone else is doing something else." So, rather than Franzen-like details about popular mores in Germany, we have stories drained of the usual personal histories and emotional struggles and instead the distance felt between one living on and another on the brink of a grave. The reader lives with Alice on the surface of the narrated moment like the pond skater, unsure if it is over a millennia-old ocean floor or a transient puddle.
Okay. Lets take a break from all the food and drinks, and pay a visit to the bathroom. The single occupancy bathroom at Ryugin is incredible and mind-blowing. Not only is it impeccably decorated and clean, but it also provides many of the items you wish you had with you but you don’t. For example, there’s hand cream, eye lash curler, 4 different kinds of mouthwash, wipes for your glasses, and pretty much an entire make-up kit! If you do use, lets say a portion sized mouthwash, a service staff will immediately go in and restock that particular item. How’s that for service?
Brouwerij St. Bernardus NV
It wasn’t like I had imagined- I thought the first thing I would look for was if baby was a boy or girl. But, I just snuggled that sweet baby- amazed once again at this miracle we call birth. It wasn’t for a couple of minutes that we figured out he was indeed a boy- our THIRD!! And we were ecstatic.
Here’s what’s my take on the matter:
i re-wrapped them, this time with five or six or seven layers, and laid down on my bed. i can feel my arm burning. it always does this. i know i deserve this burn, but it’s annoying. i suppose i am lucky i still have arms to slice up.
If using the lemon zest, add it to the sugar and rub it in with your fingertips until the sugar is moist and fragrant. Cream butter and lemon-sugar. Add egg and mix well.
Stop with the devastation.
These three wonderful items are my favorite treasures I came home with.
Obviously there’s lots of room for improvement. Next time I think I’ll try to pick a fabric that will be easier to match a thread to so it doesn’t show as much on the ruffles, and I’m not sure that my elastic placement was quite right.
There are a ton of useful tasks that you can use to help yourself, managing your Facebook, Twitter and other social networking accounts among them. A great task that would help writers would be the voicemail to email feature. I don’t know if you have ever had (like I have) a great idea for a character or plot and you have nothing to write it down with. You know that as soon as people begin hocking you to do things, you’re going to forget your brainwave, so you get cranky and irritable (okay, now I’m thinking this could just be me). Don’t fear, there is a ifttt recipe that links your cell phone and email!
You make a choice too early or too late or
Santa is in his workshop sorting out who's been good this year!! have you???
Comparative Analysis 13
Damn! He couldn’t take his eyes off her. But he knew that she would understand the turmoil which he was going through so he quickly started to walk and said, “Yeah! I had breakfast then played some games and dozed off for a while. . . .”
"We'll be writing reports, and scraping bodies off the road," he said.
Wyatt went up to the front door and rang the bell, then waited for someone to answer. And waited. And waited. He tried the door, figuring he’d let himself in, but it was locked.
$15.95 - $7.66 = $8.29 x 20% = $1.66"
A piece to a VERY old game... I'm thinking from 1950 or so...
I looked, and felt, uncomfortable all evening.
We are all a gift of life and divinity from life and divinity!
E@L laughs, good joke.
Contact your local police for more details about this.
and the trail of tears
Zack: It never was a decision we made, per se, we just never got around to finding one. Actually we never even looked, because Max's tuning is so low, and Jackie's cello more than covers the low end.
Just scream louder
Five feet three inches tall, he was dwarfed by two burly security officers.
* Make social security for only those that have worked and actually paid into it starting with those currently 40 years old and younger (everyone else stays the same as it is now). Stop the giveaway it has become. No new people will be added to this program that have not worked – no children or spouse benefits for those 40 years and younger – only for retirement purposes based on work schedule for those 40 years old and younger (we will have other programs – unfortunately – to cover these other issues).
Danny Gatton: Fine
3. Enjoy your experience and share what you have learned here with others.
So, as a host of a party, if you’re overwhelmed, put the word out and see what sticks. If you’re too prideful to ask for help, or if everyone in your circle are truly such assholes that they won’t help you, then hire someone. You’ll be out more money, but at least now you have help. (And the perspective that hey, maybe it’s time to get better friends.)
Point taken, but Dhoni and his boys have an added linguistic responsibility.
Hank: Hey Brock, how would you do it.
He is Yahweh-Jireh, the God who provides. God’s promise to provide gives security in the knowledge that God’s people will never lack a thing. He makes sure that his children have all they need.
Barn Red marker
Take care & much love,
‘Cause then you’ll damn us both.
It shouldn’t be so hard.
In the sixties, they would have seen man fly to the moon. Mini skirts were the rage, as were beehive hairdo’s, and the Beatles. What must it have been like to be there through all these changes? These events we look back on and think wow! It must have been fantastic.
In New Orleans, beignets are most popular at Cafe Du Monde, the original French coffee stand. The Cafe is open 24 hours a day, seven days a week. It closes only on Christmas Day and on the day an occasional Hurricane passes too close to New Orleans.
“The Ranch contains a barn with animals, vineyards, a garden with fruits and vegetables used in the on-site restaurant, an outdoor swimming pool and fitness center with racquetball courts, the man-made “Lake Ewok,” a hilltop observatory, a 300-seat theater called “The Stag” as well as multiple theater screening rooms, and parking that is mostly concealed underground to preserve the natural landscape.[4] Skywalker Sound was moved onto the ranch in 1987, now occupying the Technical Building.[5] The Main House has a company research library under a stained-glass dome.[1] Skywalker Ranch has its own fire station, which is part of the Marin County Mutual Aid system, and is often called on to assist firefighters in nearby Marinwood.[1]“
Something amiss
Find the reasons why
beside the horses
6. What time of year is it? How can you tell?
sweeping the world,
63. Got flowers for no reason
As I drove slowly to school to collect Jack, I thanked my daughters for behaving themselves so nicely and being the best little nurses a Mummy could ask for. "Well, Mummy, you look after me when I'm sick, so I'll look after you when you're sick," explained Phoebe, which made tears well in my red eyes and fall down my white-and-grey face. As soon as Christian arrived home last night, I crawled under several blankets and slept my way back to functionality. I must say, even though I am much better today, I am still extremely fatigued and achey - it's a horrible virus!! Must be completely better by tomorrow. I've got too much to do!
What!? Please do not leave your cell phone at home! I know that life is stressful and sometimes the only way to get away is to go for a walk. For some it’s the only alone time they ever get.
Life is passing by and I find that I am not recording it....therefore, I'm afraid it will be forgotten so I am going to really try to do better about blogging. One of my favorite things to do is to go back through and look at the pictures and happenings of our life from a couple years ago. I can remember it so much more when I write it down (obviously ;-)
The other evening we were sitting with Hikari beside the lake and saw two moons. One, fragile and thin on the water, one, solid and cold in the sky. I said she was both attractive and unattainable. Hikari said it only makes her more beautiful. He kissed me and talked about men walking on the surface of the Moon.
Final Price: $1.98 money maker!
Of course, there are a lot of things about infertility treatment that you should never ignore--your bodily sensations, and your feelings about and reactions to important people in your lives. We should also never ignore the medical facts surrounding our diagnosis, and need to learn about and carefully watch over our treatment. By letting go of the stuff that people say that really doesn't matter, we can have more energy to devote to attending to the things that do--and thus help ensure we create the most positive outcome for ourselves.
$1.00 off 2 Ghirardelli Squares Stand-Up Bags
Brittany and Vaido recently renovated a 1000 square foot chefs kitchen in a nearby business park, with an office and a small dining room for tastings in the front.
Phlebas the Phoenician, a fortnight dead,
I have used the new set called Flourished Verses. This is such a great versatile set to have in your arsenal of stamps! I used the Faux Letterpress technique for my background squares within the large white square. I inked up the Cuttlebug Preserves folder with Bordering Blue ink and then ran it through my Cuttlebug. Then I sprayed the inked/embossed paper with Marshmallow Glimmer Mist and when it dried I cut into squares. I loosely followed the sketch challenge from this week at SCS. Instead of the oval in the center of the card I chose to use this great Spellbinders birdcage! Then I added the little banner across the top with embroidery thread and freehand cut triangles for the TLC this week. The sentiment is cut with a Spellbinders rectangle and the large white square frame was done with two Spellbinders squares. The bird is part of the same birdcage set. I added the rhinestones and the more Marshmallow Glimmer Mist to complete the card.
The only dark spot was having to deal with a seriously rude woman in the flea market. As I was still unpacking and putting prices on some things, she started rummaging through my stuff (she had a table too -- well, three of them, apparently) and disappeared with some of it, explaining "my table's right over there." Later on, after the market had started she returned some of it, but kept at least one item. Later still, I had to go looking for her to either get my item(s) back or collect my money. Rather than pay what I was asking, or even try to haggle, she more or less insisted that I should take what she was offering. After a second trip closer to the end, I finally collected the rest of it. It wasn't even the money itself that annoyed me -- rudeness really irritates me and will only make me unwilling to give ground against that sort of person/behavior.
Ask I, suspiciously and with my eyes rolling!
We spent each day bouncing from house to house spending time with each person, catching up on lost time, meeting for the first time in my case, and enjoying the time together learning about Jeff's youth and time before his arrival in Kentucky.
One thing the movement did do was confirm suspicions of the foul prejudice and heavy-handedness of the Police across the US. Video footage of this occurring is a good thing, anywhere. The muted official reaction (Obama spoke vaguely in support of the protestors, although criticised them for ‘demonizing’ the financial sector) says it all essentially; good effort, but you’re not powerful enough yet. I hope this commentary doesn’t sound too snidely. It is a simple truth that the Arab Spring is the far more important global social event of last year and defying evil theocratic oppression is always going to be a bigger deal than the spectacle of ‘Occupy’.
49. Heart palpitations. A racing heart usually accompanies a heart opening. It only lasts for a few moments and means that the heart is re-balancing itself after an emotional release. I had one episode that terrified me: I woke up in the middle of the night, my heart pounding. I thought it was going tocome right out of my chest. It only happened once and was, I understand, a huge heart-chakra opening. But I did check it out. There is nothing wrong with my heart.
By the time The Funk had set up camp downstairs and called in his posse — Crabby, Impatient and Unmotivated — I was in full-on Negative Nancy mode, rocking unwashed peach capri pajama pants, an eight-year-old blue t-shirt and my best black cardigan for the better part of four days. The visual just gets better and better, doesn’t it?
So she proceeds to tell me she hears the violins.
What have I given to _________________?
( ) Review the MSDS and try to work around it.
not really experienced before. My concept of angels comes
None of these were "GOOD" answers to me. Enraged and frustrated we asked "well, what's next!?" Either a D&C (a surgical procedure where they put you under anethesia for an hour, dialate you and suck everything out, medicine to help move it out, let it come out naturally. I wanted closer as soon as possible and the Dr. suggested we go ahead and prep for a D&C tomorrow, but, that we could always change our minds. I kept apologizing to Charles, asking him "I hope you still love me and want me as your wife, I hope I can have babies in the future, I'm so sorry I ruined everything, I am so sorry and I don't know what do to." I was sooo excited to finally be a mom, seriously being a mom is one of my hearts greatest desires, and it was ripped right out of my hands. I felt empty, rejected, and less than perfect. I questioned God, why he did this to me. Why he created something so terrible that would make you and your body pregnant, but there was no baby inside. I questioned him and why he didn't alert me and a more substantial way... I was so upset that this was happening to us. I would have rather still been trying to get pregant and not have "failed" and had to wait, and start over, already blemished and torn.
Amanda Marcotte does a fine job of eviscerating a Katie Roiphe (no, I’m not linking) column in which the latter apparently is kinda miffed that women can’t–gee whiz!–get a sense of humor and enjoy the kooky, colorful jungle that is navigating sexual harassment. Because she does such a good job of ripping to shreds this spectacularly, like, omg-is-this-woman-even-capable-of-wiping-her-own-ass-level stupid column, I’m left with little to add but this:
Therefore, starting Monday, whenever I return essays all marked up in the brightest, most blood red ink I can find, I will first stand at the front of the class and, as loudly as humanly possible, snap on some ominous looking doctor's gloves. Then I will pick up the stack of essays, and as I return the first one - to the most obnoxious student in the room, I will say in my most resonating bass voice, "Now turn your head and cough."
And I’m not trying to show off… really, I’m not. I’m not trying to be all “oh hey, look at me, I read books and watch an exorbitant amount of movies and television shows, and OH MAN! LOOK AT ALL THE SONGS I HAVE ON MY ITUNES! I am far more … whatever… than others.” I’m just… interested in finding new things that’ll be fun (for me) or interesting (again, for me) or maybe even help me describe the craziness around me (most people would just call it life. I call it insanity) in ways that I could never come up with myself. I still find new songs I didn’t know I even had on my iTunes when I hit shuffle and they, if I can use the cliché, speak to me, because they pop up right when I need them.
I was hugely impressed with her, although her friend had had Benny do the same and Benny is a very lazy animal.
(By the way, this recipe does not follow my traditional Altered Plates format, however, I think it's important to observe the integrity of the original published in Dave's book. Therefore, if you notice a difference, that's why. Also, I used coconut flour for the barley flour, but either one is fine.)
The 6 o'clock news reported numerous cases of drivers stopping on the freeway then exiting their cars just to stand and look at the golden orb in the sky. There were hundreds of crashes and wrecks because of the earthquake-like suddenness of the brightness.
Coup de Torchon (France) directed by Bertrand Tavernier
and all the fun that goes with wearing the wrong skirts in the wrong era.
For Work:
Mom I love you so much and just want to wish you a very happy Mother's Day, even if I am lame and not there and didn't send a card (see:"Phobia").
I was doing okay with this turn of events until the doctor started talking about how this could change things. She said that if I feel like I'm in labor, or my water breaks, I will need to come in much sooner than we had last talked about, so that they could assess things. She said that the earlier I come in, the more they can do to try to manually move the baby into a head-down position, if she is not head down at that point. When she got to the part where she said that she would do her best, and thought she could move the baby, but that if all failed the only option would be a c-section, I confess that I lost it and burst into tears. I know--I'm totally pathetic. I know it's true that c-section is the only option with a transverse baby who had failed to turn, and I knew the caveat was coming, but the reality just isn't one I want to face. I managed to gain control fairly quickly, and the doctor is reasonably sure she can make the baby turn. She doesn't think my risks of having a c-section are any worse than anyone else's going into labor, even given that my baby is transverse right now. All of that was really positive and helpful to hear. But I'm really, really bummed, nevertheless.
There are many more titles out there in the world of steampunk comic books, graphic novels, manga, and webcomics; this brief list just highlighted a few that I've winnowed out as the best that 2010 has to offer.
On the bright side, I feel pretty good about the current revision. My first draft was a measly 50,000 words, the second draft wasn't much more than that. Now, I'm at 81,000 words and going strong. I think the story is stronger than it was the first couple of times through. My characters are fleshed out a little more than they were at first.
The mission of the National Association for the Advancement of Colored People is to ensure the political, educational, social, and economic equality of rights of all persons and to eliminate racial hatred and racial discrimination.
In a sense, if you see only his Wilfredo character you might underestimate Matt Roper’s full potential.
I had to leave the concert early, because the bus runs only once an hour on Sunday nights, and I didn't want to be waiting at the bus station for 45 minutes late at night.
In fact to the uninitiated the situation here can be quite bewildering –
Since that damn auction a week ago, Junsu keep trying to suicide and it left me with no choice but lock him in his room, of course after I make sure that nothing can’t be used to kill. It’s not that I want to but I have to.
Miliband claimed that his alternative is a kinder capitalism, one that is not so aggressive. He argues that it was neoliberalism that caused the current crisis and not capitalism as such. But in reality capitalism will always ensure that the wealthy will make profits at the expense of ordinary workers.
It's so interesting to me what 'ignites the fire' for the creative process to jump start - I don't have one specific thing that sets me off - for me that is part of the discovery process in my art practice - this past weekend it was ripping the paper off a surface I had been working on a few weeks ago(you can see the start I made at that time in the previous post). That's all it took for me to begin working - a surface that already had history, an interesting texture, the bones of a map already formed -I seem to be drawn to very humble materials right now - this is work on cardboard and I'm still working on cardboard - it has its own challenges and for now I'm finding it very satisfying - it rips very easily and allows me to use paint, wax, wax paper and just about anything I want to layer - I'm going about putting together the pieces of 2012 - these pieces will be used throughout the year in all kinds of ways - the first photo shows what was left after I tore the top layer off.........
April 26, 2012, marked the 64th birthday of the state of Israel. May 15th, however, will bring the 64th anniversary of the Palestinian al-Nakba, or disaster, during which roughly 700,000 Palestinians were displaced by fleeing or expulsion.
Get Kids To Dress Themselves By Making It EasyOver at I'm An Organizing Junkie if found a smart idea on how to get little kids to dress themselves properly. You just sort outfits putting one set of clothes for each day into a different bag. Mark the "dress up" clothes bag differently somehow. She suggested using a purple ribbon for the Sunday clothes bag.
“Our matinees used to attract a small, demented audience filled with the sort of characters who could have been in David Croft sitcoms.
2. Blog about this Giveaway (3 entries)
... read up on the chemical processes of rotting apples, thanks to one fourth grader and one Science Fair project due next week (and here's a good one for you: Why does fruit rot like the speed of lightning when you don't want it to, but never rots fast enough the one time you need it to? Time to find some fungus around here, which shouldn't be all that hard to do... heh.). Jealous, aren't you?
Roger Waters The Wall – North American Tour Itinerary:
8) "I forgot if this is premium or regular" (drinks) "Regular"
another moment left behind.
Marlins English test from an approved centre (stamped) – overall score 80% and sub categories not less than 70%.
The sneaky so and so!
Described as a photographer who glosses up 1970s porn chic in the name of high fashion, the work of Terry Richardson has been featured by Supreme, Gucci, Miu Miu, Jimmy Choo and French Vogue. He also isn’t known for giving interviews. Though sometimes controversial, he prefers his photography to tell his story. Granted, his photographs are also sometimes misunderstood, but at least almost always honest. Laura M. Holson of The New York Times recently sat down with Richardson for a feature about the photographer’s inspirations, photography style, and often misinterpreted methods.
1. I tried the belt on and figured out how much length I needed to lose in the elastic.
“Don’t worry,” I say with an optimism that I don’t actually feel. “It will be working in a jiffy.” This is odd, because jiffy is a word I don’t think I have ever used before. The vinegar fumes must have gone to my head.
If you are using a Copic original marker you can simulate the "lift" at the end by lifting up as much as possible at the end of your stroke, then coming back with a colorless blender from the opposite direction. This is also useful if you got your colors too dark. Go back from the opposite direction with the blender and push the extra dye into the shadows. On thin paper you can remove excess color by keeping a napkin or paper-towel under your work and it will help soak up extra dye.
I loved this book! It was hard to stop turning pages just for a bathroom break! Alex and Darla are two teenagers trying to survive in a world that has been turned upside down by a super volcanoe eruption. The world has completley changed overnight. Everything is covered in Ash, there are massive food shortages, people are acting crazy and violent and these two teenagers are trying to survive in this mess. Both Alex and Darla find out just how tough they really are. They are trying to walk over a hundred miles to get to Alex's parents, or to find out if his parents even survived the disaster. Along the way, they constantly have obstacles to overcome. Their journey is a fascinating one! You will love Alex and Darla. They start out as innocent kids and will surprise you over and over again with what a couple of kids can accomplish. Although they have to grow up fast, they still manage to hold on to some of their innocent qualities. Alex and Darla show us that in the wake of horror, you can survive and no matter how horrible your existence may be, love can get you through.
this is a complete look at my interests (fashion, music, film, art, media, etc.) & how I see the world around me. there will be no vanity, no mindless posts.
many persons strive for high ideals,
What are your plans for NYE? What are your dreams for the new year?
The wife is an art critic and, in our early days, these restaurants were a godsend when we visited the Met, Guggenheim and Whitney. We couldn't afford to eat anywhere else in the neighborhood! Regular New Yorkers and tourists visiting Museum Mile don't want to have to rely on Cafe Boulud for lunch.
In February 1952, our first son, Hsien Loong, was born. She took maternity leave for a year.
- Full Moon wo Sagashite (i love the ending in the manga. the anime version is also good but somehow i wished that takuto regained his memories.)
I haven't really taught her to cook
Be sure to visit the rest of the SSD team and our guests for their fabulous creations!
And lucky you, I have a gift card to Shabby Apple for 1 lucky winner!!
It's giving more when you feel like giving up,
Everything pretty much inspires me. Improving someones life by improving their home inspires me, making people happy when they come home from work inspires me, changing someones outlook via design inspires me. Moving someones senses with design inspires me. It's all about helping people and making them happy. I'm by an extremely visual person and I can remember the tiniest design detail or color combination in any space I walk in, and get a gut instinct of what to do or what I think needs to
"... But Glenn Beck is saying something else: "Leave Christianity." Again and again in the Gospels, Jesus mentions our responsibility to care for the poor, to work on their behalf, to stand with them. In fact, when asked how his followers would be judged he doesn't say that it will be based on where you worship, or how you pray, or how often you go to church, or even what political party you believe in. He says something quite different: It depends on how you treat the poor.
Take a moment and read this article as well, it makes some nice, not-in-your-face points, and has big print so you know it's not going to bore you to death with too many convoluted details: "Get Rid of Chemical Fabric Softeners - Protect Yourself And the Environment." What you may like about what they have to say here, is that you can still get soft clothes, but there are some viable, environmentally friendly alternatives. Come on, don't skip over the link--really, I'm a lazy reader myself, and didn't find it long-winded.
According to Capcom, Leon S. Kennedy is paired with US government agent Helena Harper, Chris Redfield teams up with fellow BSAA member Piers Nivans and Jake Muller is joined by Sherry Birkin, daughter of former key Umbrella scientists, William and Annette. They’ll travel from North America, the war-torn Eastern European state of Edonia and the Chinese city of Lanshiang battling a new threat.
EastEnders: Ace Bhatti (Yusef Khan)
YEEEEES! I wanted to scream but instead I wrote
The show is predominantly aimed at children aged 9-12, but due to vast public demand there are now performances for adults. So, fellow Whovians. The real Twin Dilema I find myself in is: Should I treck up to Manchester and see it? It's £25 a ticket, it'll cost me the best part of £50 for the train journey, I don't know of anyone else who would be willing to go on said pilgrimage with me, as my sweetheart is away. But I'm a completist and surely I shouldn't miss out on this one?
Only with pain, can there be relief. It allows for appreciation.
An important consideration in any hard science fiction story. Some of my betas did bring up the question of whether my characters ought to be waving guns around in spaceships, given how deadly a hull breach would be.
It's time for lunch. Something simple, you've got groceries to put away.
...and thankfully its come together beautifully....
As the passion of living
Tomato Passata 1/2 cup
On Tuesday, FIFA general secretary Jerome Valcke, visiting South Africa to assess its readiness for the Confederations Cup, further calmed fears that the World Cup might be moved.
And he begins to remember -- the games in the streets, the neighbors joining in, the buzz and excitement and feeling that there was always something fun going on. Joe Maddon is quite a bit older than I am -- he turns 58 in February -- and he lives a much different life as the brilliantly successful manager of the Tampa Bay Rays. And, as I say, I had never been to Hazleton before. Still, when he talked about his childhood, it all felt so familiar. I saw my own street in Cleveland, in Northeast, Ohio, with it's tiny aluminum siding houses and postage stamp yards and rusty cars … telephone wires stretched above the road like barbed wire.
“We wish to explain about the attack we carried out on ThisDay newspapers. Some of the reasonswhy we decided to attack some media houses, especially ThisDay, is because the paper was used in dishonouring our prophet Mohammad (SAW), during a beauty pageant in Kaduna in November 2002.
Consider robbing Peter to pay Paul, if Peter has more than he needs and Paul doesn't have enough. As I mentioned up front, this first of my three-part memory-for-MIPS blog entry is focused on making the best use of the memory already allocated for your DB2 buffer pools. That doesn't mean that you can't make a pool larger -- you can, if you decrease the size of another pool by the same amount. Suppose that buffer pools BP2 and BP3 are both sized at 40,000 buffers each in your system. If the read I/O rate for BP2 is 20 per second and the rate for BP3 is 2000 per second, I'd seriously consider taking a big chunk of BP2's buffers away and giving them to BP3 (for example, you might take BP2 from 40,000 down to 20,000 buffers, and take BP3 from 40,000 buffers to 60,000. Such a move might put a serious dent in the high read I/O rate seen for BP3 without substantially increasing the read I/O rate associated with BP2.
.old punk
BIRTH CONTROL LEADS TO DAMNATION. Instructing the mothers of the Church, President Joseph F. Smith said in June, 1917: “I regret, I think it is a crying evil, that there should exist a sentiment or a feeling among any members of the Church to curtail the birth of their children. I think that is a crime wherever it occurs, where husband and wife are in possession of health and vigor and are free from impurities that would be entailed upon their posterity. I believe that where people undertake to curtail or prevent the birth of their children that they are going to reap disappointment by and by. I have no hesitancy in saying that I believe that is one of the greatest crimes of the world today, this evil practice.”
“Dear Ann,
But yeah, decent day I think.
While the pharmacist jobs north dakota is important, the pharmacist jobs north dakota down to see birds in North Dakota, Grand Forks is a little slower-paced than most. However, if you do not have to get out, meet some new people, make friend and increase your deductible, co-pay and co-insurance ratio. Your out-of-pocket expense will be awarded prizes for the pharmacist jobs north dakota, or, otherwise, pay the pharmacist jobs north dakota. With partnership policies, the pharmacist jobs north dakota at the pharmacist jobs north dakota and if you are dating in North America. The Steele Birding Drive. It goes through Kidder country, which is home to the city avoid the pharmacist jobs north dakota by New Orleans in similar circumstances; and when North Dakota singles.
And looking upon Jesus as he walked, he saith, Behold the Lamb of God!
Jane Fonda’s erotic ordeal is a perversly innocent bit of sadism in a film which flirts with the sick (Barb getting nibbled by clockwork dolls in front of an audience of feral children sounds worse than it plays) but doesn’t seem to cross any lines of taste, somehow. Apart from casting Marcel Marceau in a role that requires him to do nothing but talk. That really shows up Vadim’s particular brand of anti-talent.
Also, interactive web ads would be so much more appealing. engaging and enticing than traditional advertising. People would see our banners on the web and be fascinated by them and then click to learn amazing new things about our products and then order right from the page.
Now we are more settled, I have the energy and time to stop buying herbal tea bags and make my own tea. How crazy to buy boxed, bagged cut herbs when I can come back with a basketful yards from my door!
A few weeks ago, my daughter's school Chamber Choir was singing Evensong in Southwark Cathedral, so I went along to listen. Many years ago, when I first crossed the Thames to live South of the River (which as all Londoners know is slightly more drastic than crossing the Channel to live permanently in France), in the daytime Bankside was busy with suits, doctors, and wholesale cabbages. But outside the working week it was Tumbleweed Town: anyone who could fled to the salubrious suburbs, and those few who couldn't had nothing to tempt them out of their grim blocks of flats.
If you want to catch a big fish you need to believe that your company can make a different to theirs. Don’t get stuck in the mindset that a big company does not need the product/service of your small company. Remind yourself and team that they NEED YOU!
The lines get blurry. A good measure of common sense and integrity on the part of ad agencies and their clients, would surely go a long way in helping to retain some sort of ethics. And for the most part, large companies don't lie about their products. The costs involved if they're caught are too great, and serve as a good deterrent. But when a message has to be delivered to millions of people, it's quite difficult to predict how all of them will perceive or construe it.
~ Five year olds just make a mess when trying to clean up broken eggs.
tenía dinero, amigos y hogar.
Observation
I have always been interested in decent beers, always checking the beer isle at supermarkets for something a bit different but it wasn’t until I bought Michael Jackson’s ‘Great Beer Guide: 500 Classic Brews’ that it started to become somewhat of an obsession.
Montevideo – Uruguay
Note, that your friend may end up in a facility in a different state, far from the family and friends. Also, as an “alien” your friend does not have the same constitutional protection as a U.S. citizen, so arguing that her rights are being violated by transferring her from New York to Texas is not going to work. However, your friend has rights to privacy and counsel. ICE must also inform her relatives as soon as possible, so that they may make arrangements for visitation or hire legal representation for her before any court dates.
Johnny Cash was a deeply religious man his whole life. Even in the midst of his problems with drug addiction, he always looked at it as a test from God. Cash’s contradictions are apparent from early on as he embraced the wild rockabilly music of the ’50s while still singing gospel music every chance he had. He was known as “The Man in Black” who released hit albums and toured constantly. Throughout his career he sang thousands of songs; some of his best were about liars, robbers and killers. The main line from the title song on Cash’s last release goes “There ain’t no grave gonna hold my body down.” Near the end of his life the only songs that mattered spoke of faith, and the coming glory. He quotes scripture on “I Corinthians 15:15”—“Oh death, where is thy sting. Oh grave, where is thy victory.” His wife June passed away four months before him in 2003, and you can hear on these final recordings how ready he is to join her. There is a contemplative spirit that pervades these last recordings and the selection of buddy Kris Kristopherson’s “For The Good Times” was another beautiful choice. At the end of his life such lines as: “Don’t look so sad. I know it’s over. But life goes on, and this old world will keep on turning. Let’s just be glad we had some time to spend together” carry a gentle goodbye to his fans. “Ain’t No Grave” is a somber, melancholy album, but this poignant selection of final tunes ultimately becomes a touching farewell from one of America’s most popular performers.
1/3 cup lite mayonnaise
6. I had enough of my cheap Polaroid camera, I am tired of having to refocus the camera after taking a few pic. I bought Nikon digital camera. Pictures of sewing project will be shown on my next post.
Santa Barbara Winery
Cate Blanchett (Elizabeth)
That was unsuccessful and Polayya was loaned a dilapidated car for the Easter weekend.
After all, our hobby would probably get pretty boring without opinions, wouldn't it?
But Cobra Zero was by the standards of Alcohol Free grog, not that bad. My only experience of alcohol free grog before was nasty Kaliber and a not bad (though not good) Alkohol Frei Schneider Weiss German attempt at grog free grog. By both standards, I like the Cobra attempt.
So now, for me, at least, the puzzle is solved. The man in the portraits is Christopher Uptake.
Merci Paris, t'as capturé la drame, mais pas la bonne.
6" approx. leg length
Well, I for one am pretty good at herding cats. And getting them to all make different complimentary sides for a potluck.
Here's what I did -
You’ve been blogging for a few days and have no idea how God is going to use this thing (you haven’t even had a chance to tell your dad you are blogging again in your joint venture.) How the heck do people stumble upon a new blog anyway? When Beth Moore asks for your miracle. And in the comments section you decide to take another little jump off the divine diving board God has lead you to and link to this blog. You sort of feel like you are going to throw up but here it goes.
Jamie has decided to go outside and throw up on the pavement and Rob seems to be so drunk that he doesn’t realise that he is feeling Simon up (who is sitting between us) not me. Simon seems torn between laughing and looking violated and is inching away from Rob as close to me as he can. I see Robs hand start stroking his knee and Simon jumps up nervously.
I deal with one of the UK high street banks in other countries on a fairly regular basis and I have to say that the service they provide is very good. So I guess it comes down to the banking regulation in individual countries that prevents them from running amok elsewhere. So there you have it, if they are allowed to then they will.
I get it. Times are hard. Gas is $4.00 a gallon. People don't have any money because they lost their job. Just because your house is worth $100 grand less than you paid for it last year, doesn't mean I am going to let you have my car to make up the difference. But why are they the one calling me? Why are they calling to buy a car they can't afford to begin with? Why? Because people are cheap? No, because people are dumb!
Like a radio gibbered and tuned far left of center,
To kick off our new inspiration blog we are offering some fabulous ribbon candy......
6. Form rounded cookie dough balls, using about 1 T of dough. Place dough balls on a cookie sheet lined with parchment paper or a Silpat or on a non-stick. Your dough will be chunky, like this (see below).
Can you imagine tackling white water rapids with no life jacket? Would you consider navigating house-sized boulders without mapping out the danger zones?
Eyes, opening to a dream
One thing I have learned over these years is that it is the "little things" that really matter. Of course Big things are great, but it is the day to day, little things that make the biggest impact in life. Your spouse needs to know that you love them, that you respect them, and that you will be there to handle together whatever comes your way. Not only does our spouse need to know how we feel through your actions, but they need to hear it, too. Our words are powerful and they matter. Prov 13:18 says, " There is one who speaks rashly like the thrusts of a sword, But the tongue of the wise brings healing." Choose your words wisely, express appreciation through the "little things" and you will in turn get the best from your spouse.
They just didn’t turn on the love light, I’m sure
From here I used half to make the cutout cookies for the mini and large sandwich cookies, then divided the remaining into 2 (very thin) cookies in the bottom of 8″ circle pans.
We need the right to freely and publicly criticize politicians, religious people and their beliefs, and historians—indeed, even those historians who affirm the Holocaust. I’ve learned a lot listening to Holocaust deniers, including ways that they resemble other conspiracy theorists, the methods that Nazis used to suppress information about the gas chambers, and the paucity of direct written links between Hitler himself and the extirpation of the Jews. It should not be a crime to promulgate such denialism, odious though those viewpoints may seem.
It was a privelege to read about them.
7:10: Junebug gets a bath.
My parents, Aunt R. and Uncle T. take my five year old sister, CheekyMonkey, to arrange our ferry tickets, leaving me and my brother Red BellyButtonBoy in the car alone (alone except for Glenn Frey, Don Henley and Cliff). Their biggest mistake here, is thinking that CheekyMonkey is the root of all trouble. This is just a smoke-screeen RedBellyButtonBoy and I have carefully constructed over the years.
John Riley, a former magistrate in Spencer County, sees hemp as a potentially lucrative crop that could become a renewable fuel source. It would be a big transformation for a crop once known as a major source for rope.
Rating: 5 stars
This recipe is perfect for grilling season. I'm hoping to supply you with more great grilling recipes soon, as well as another wine tutorial for wines that go exceptionally well with grilled foods in the coming summer months, so stay tuned!
The TTAB has created a clear rule with a clear remedy. Therefore, asserting fraud in opposition and cancellation proceedings, either as a defense or as a strategy for removing obstacles to registration of a junior mark, can be a very effective tool.
When we got home, a closer look revealed she needed some work.
Well, Clementine wants to join in the party. The first JUSTICE LEAGUE is set for JUNE 4th (This Saturday). Stay tuned for an announcement of the location spot.
During the time of Dr. Verwoerd. the living standards of Blacks were rising at 5,4% per year against that of the whites at 3,9% per year. In 1965 the economic growth of South Africa was the second highest in the world at 7,9%. The rate of inflation was a mere 2% per annum and the prime interest rate only 3% per annum. Domestic savings were so great that South Africa needed no foreign loans for normal economic expansion.
Favorite activity in your free time: Motorcycling
Pokemon
Horny professor. Failing coed. No tenure. –“A Short History of Academia,” by Sue Grafton
Such a thing as a street photography untouched by man does not exist. By the way, the photograph above, K-damm Couple, is unposed pose, but not quite. I asked the girl to look into the camera, and that little gesture makes a big different. You might say that I was stretching the rules a bit. Hopefully Barthes would have liked it.
To end on a lighter note and in honour of the brilliant Hatem Ben Arfa after his stunning goal against Bolton, here’s some well-known footage of him arguing with Abou Diaby as teenagers. As a non-French speaker, this is still pretty cool:
Allow 15 minutes (in low season; double in the summer) to get through security (they check inside all bags) and wait in front of the main street train station. There is an opening show where Mickey & friends drive up on the train, wave & sing a song, a lucky family (we got to do this once!!) will ‘help’ open the park & throw pixie dust out, and then count down to open the park. (The pictures are of us when we opened the park – INCREDIBLY magical!!!)
The story is more of an eye-opener about things that happen in the media industry and how people (read: cops, politicians, the underworld and media) work their ways around situations and their counter-parts. What happens behind the curtains and the camera is only known to the insiders. Oswald bares the truth, and how!
So, fill one tube and let it cool and then test it. Does it melt right? Taste normal? Not give you hives? Awesome. Snap the rest of the tubes into your handy tray deal, fill up the rest of the tubes, let them cool and cap them. Done.
“You want to tell me what you think you are doing. Let go of the girl.”
Take it then with an open heart
We're in or out of the money
*1/3 cup heavy cream or (not skim) milk
"Her voice is normally high. When she gets excited or mad, it gets higher until you think she's going to fly away."
Man loses hair – male pattern baldness – genetic problem – let’s rectify by transplanting – live with what you have got or not!
Meister Max is a sophisticated and premium beer with an international dimension for the stylish and strong men only. It enforces your masculinity and expresses who you truly are; a virile man... It's part of the way you look and the way you act. It's got the looks and power just like you.
aha!
She teaches us to question, to think, and to act.
There is something beautiful that happens to my storm, When I hear certain songs. Sometimes its the lyrics and sometimes it’s the musical arrangement. This song its the lyrics…
- The Allman Brother (no explanation needed...I hope...otherwise you're too young to be reading this filth). The "Whipping Post" and "Rambling Man" and "Sweet Melissa" will definately kick ass.
Today, we’re coming clean.
A long time passed. Hubby came up to the kiosk to see how I was getting on.......
And the same goes for other places in Tennessee, with varying degrees of what and how much those counties are going to be hit economically. In a state that has already been struggling with disastrous state budgetary issues, widespread unemployment, and general economic downturn statewide for some time now – it’s no wonder if everyone’s holding their breath to see where we go from here.
I was broken at a very young age. A victim of sexual abuse as a pre-schooler, at the hands of an uncle, I seem to be even more deeply affected by the rejection of my mother. She was a delightful person and a lot of fun to be around, but she and I couldn’t be more different. I was like one of those barn animals that the mother rejects and someone else has to take care of it.
She added: “I had so much time to kind of go over things and get over things, which is amazing. I think if I hadn’t had my voice trouble, I would never have broached those subjects with myself. Now I just feel really at peace.”
I love this fucking beer. If I had to choose between saving my mother from a serial killer and a case of Moose Drool, I would save my mother. Clearly. If I had to choose between my mother and an unlimited supply of Moose Drool, it would be a pretty difficult decision. I love my mom. I really do. But she's old and will probably die in about 30 years. But the Moose Drool will last me 50-60 years at least. I mean, I'm not a fan of immortality, but would consider it if I had an unlimited supply of Moose Drool.
My sweet, adorable, funny little guy turned 4 this month. He's at the age where the anticipation of a birthday party has been building for months, and he wanted a robot birthday party. No problem! I love throwing parties, and nothing more than a kid's party. Going all out with every little detail is loads of fun for me, and even though I know he doesn't notice the half of it, I love doing it. So here it is, and thanks for looking!
Which is flippin' weird. And uncomfortable. But, ya know, I'll raise my hand on occasion and participate anyway. I oppress like that.
On the eve of the visit of the Brazilian President to China, the country has imposed additional tariffs on imports of several Chinese-made synthetic fibers.
Supports Children and Adults with Communication Difficulties.
*I halved the recipe I found, so feel free to use 1 cup polenta and double the other ingredients for a larger batch.
Friday, September 21:
If you are a local performer the best way to get your face familiarized is to attend one of the shows you hope to be booked in. Stay for the show and approach the producer afterwards, introduce yourself and express your interest in performing there. Follow up with an email and send video clips and descriptions of your act (I will go into this in more detail later). When a performer introduces themselves to me in person, it helps solidify who they are to me in my mind among a sea of faceless emails and complicated burlesque names. It also helps me to know that the performer already knows what the venue and the venue's clientele are like, and more importantly, what type of acts are booked and what type of stage (or lack of) she will be dealing with.
Anti-Brizard/Broad agenda attitudes have gained traction among many of the parents I’ve organized and worked with in Rochester. When parents heard from the media that there was a proposed plan to close their child’s school rather than from Brizard or his administration, that angered and mobilized many parents. Some parents I work with have brought serious alternative proposals, ideas, and discussions to Brizard’s door only to leave feeling patronized, dismissed, and degraded. Frequently, parents, teachers, students, or community members who question or criticize Brizard’s agenda in any shape or fashion are thrown to the side as mere “noise” or “defenders of the status quo” (not a new rhetorical technique by any means).
I am grateful for you all, thank you,
As I’ll probably miss a bar,
Lots of interesting things were discussed in particular, copyright clauses and warranty and idemnity.
1. Thank the person who nominated you and include a link back to their blog
I finished my 5k coaching programme on the web-site, which I’d used to keep me running and keep my fitness levels up during the Winter. It surpassed my expectations by improving my pace also. I’ve signed up for their beginner version of the 10k coaching programme. This also runs over 12 weeks and will have me running 13km runs some weeks and up to 37km in a week!
Hollister nodded. Corporal's privilege. PFCs took Cooper's lectures more stoically.
In your quest for great skin be sure to avoid over-exfoliation. This can cause chronic inflammation that will accelerate the aging process. It is possible to combine the right chemical and physical exfoliators for maximum benefits and find the perfect balance for your skin. The secret is not to overdo it. If your skin looks red and angry or becomes painful or sensitive after exfoliation, give it a rest and use a bland cleanser and moisturizer for a few days while your skin recovers.
May Thy rich grace impart
I like the way my mother does it. When she comes to visit us, she just goes to bed and gets up when she feels like it. She rolls over on her deaf ear and falls asleep. My Dad, on the other hand, seems to really enjoy when music rehearsal starts at 11:00 p.m. LOL..
some of which will be used on the day)
In the case of the 598 debtors whose debt is managed by the participating institutions on NAMA’s behalf (par debt of €13 billion), the business plan cycle is approaching completion. It is expected that the current engagement with these debtors will yield additional reversals of asset transfers to relatives by the time the process has completed.
No, thank you, I'll go to a shop.
reservation.
Within a few months of joining the SAS, I trepidatiously (my favourite made-up word!) put my name up to do a monthly blog for The Awfully Big Blog Adventure. I had never done a blog, was still not internet savvy, and wondered what I would write about, if I would have enough to say, what other Sassies would make of it, and of me. Now three months on since my first blog, and having done a few, I know I was worrying unnecessarily. Some idea about what to write about has always materialised at the time. The blog is sub-headed “the ramblings of a few scattered authors,” and that’s exactly what it is.
with bits of
Artist: Lauryn Hill
But no real salvation is possible. As Hitchcock concludes, "The bomb must always go off." That's his first rule of narrative.
Have you recovered from Christmas yet? It took me a couple of days to not feel exhausted.....but man, was it worth it! We had a fantastic time, both on Christmas Eve and on Christmas Day!
Happy Day!
Justina finds friends and help in the most unlikely of places. Who are some of your favorite characters and how did they come to you?
I also found this video called 32 which it turns out is a tribute to his brother.
This week we are being sponsored by. . . .
After that, the space program became what I think may have been my first true obsession. I read everything I could find, which wasn’t much, as this was before I discovered the library. I even managed to get my father, that great detester of childish things, to buy me a couple of models to assemble with no help at all. But I was so determined, so blinded by my obsession to express this new passion that, with no guidance or assistance whatsoever, I actually set about building my own rocket.
- Bake at 180 degree celsius for 20 min or till cook (use a toothpick to insert into the muffin and if it comes out clean then it’s already cook)
-“This is your home” He answered her gently.
Amongst other things, every year I buy books for people. And yes, I do actually pay for them. Rarely do I get someone a big bestseller or literary must-read (though there was the year I got my father The DaVinci Code), but more often than not it's titles I've found while browsing books at non-bookstores. Being an agent, I'm pretty familiar with what's on the tables at Barnes & Noble or the front page of Amazon. But the books that tend to get me most excited at the holidays are those little gift books or ridiculous coffee table books. The other day at a small boutique here in LA, I found Concorde by Frederic Beniada and Michel Fraile, a book that's a few years old but still remarkable in its detail, scope and beauty, and All My Friends Are Dead, a morbidly funny little picture book for adults by Avery Monsen and Jory John. Two gifts accounted for!
Throughout my working life, from the mid sixties to the beginning of the 21st Century, I wished I had a second spouse, sometimes a third one.
1) row - (an argument)
On to haiku: Foam won last week and is hosting this week. Her topic is silence. I know it's late. But you still have time to enter. 5-7-5 is the format. You can put up as many as you wish but she will only judge 2. You must tell her which ones to judge.
Enough preaching about CrossFit....I shared this because while working out I have also started to adopt the eating habits that are prevalent among CrossFitters...which is a combination of the 'paleo diet' (basically lots of fruit and veggies, gluten free and good proteins) and a zone diet (again, lost of fruits and veggies, limited grains, if any, and quality lean protein). Being food-obsessed this was a bit tough for me at first, I have no gluten sensitivity and frankly love to try new things so the thought of limiting myself to these confines really bothered me at first. Slowly though I have adapted, partly because our CrossFit gym (much love to Milestone Crossfit!!) set up a 6-week challenge which I eagerly joined and partly because I have seen what the combo of this diet and CrossFit does for people. In four weeks my 'cravings' for grains and super-sweet candy, etc. have dwindled (not going to lie here, I would still kill for hot-buttered fresh baked french bread!) and I feel great. So again, why am I sharing all this? Because it will color a lot of what I will be posting in the near term, most of my coming posts will be recipes that have been made since the beginning of my 6-week challenge and will be reflective of ingredients that are 'zone-paleo' friendly. So be wary those of you who aren't so excited about 'healthy' food, these things will all be slightly better for you than most that I have posted in the past but none of them will taste like 'health' food, I refuse to give up good food for just healthy food.
Fortunately the steps taken to improve safety in Formula One have been of massive leaps and boundaries. Many drivers since 1994, including Robert Kubica, Heikki Kovalainen, Takuma Sato and more recently in Hungary in 2009 with Felipe Massa have had serious, frightening accidents. All have been able to live the tail and go racing again. The 1994 San Marino Grand Prix will go down as the darkest weekend in motorsport history and eighteen years on, its pain will never heal.
It also leaves a loop hole for term time holidays for school pupils which might later be all-too-easily closed by government. The obvious next step is for them to decide that deregistration on demand itself is a nuisance.
Okay, what in the world was happening? As little an accident as that couldn’t get me in hospital! Gosh, an Operation Room?!
High-Quality Watch Bands From Citizen
His message – “With the looks of a Goddess, you deserve roses and kisses…xXx I would really like to get to know someone as yourself
For the man's grief abhorrent, draws and presses
Yes.. we have been fighting the feelings of being homesick. Again, it just comes with the territory. Monday night we were feeling it pretty hard. It was our 8th day in PA and the day after our one year anniversary being married. On top of it all, It our first day away from each other since we've been here. We thought a lot of home and our emotions led us to wanting to be there right now, but God saw our need. That night we went to LCBC's newcomers class and boy did we get just what we needed! In the class, David (the Senior Pastor) and Jason Mitchell (the Nextgen Pastor) casted the vision of LCBC and told the 100+ people in the room what LCBC was all about. The perspective of LCBC, the philosophy of how it translates into practical daily life, the priorities and where LCBC's heart is, it was like the "About Me" on a Facebook page for LCBC. It was great. Through all of the people that taught and shared that night, God was reminding us why we are here. My spirit was lifted so much that I found myself wanting to yell out an agreeing "Amen!" by the end of it!
Lullabye, rockabye, lullabye loo.
hands spilling over ivory stones
No matter what, make sure you check out the blog sometime on Monday for a full recap and review of tonight’s finale. And as always, I want to hear what you think as well!
I have previously written, at some length, about the Sheridan case, and the potential implications for (a) the trial verdict and (b) possible prosecution of witnesses at the trial itself for alleged perjury.
Somerville
One evening we set out to try one and Suara, our driver (and now great friend) dropped us off at a place simply called 'JBS'. The tables were arranged on the sand facing the sun set and we selected seafood from tanks which was then weighed, cleaned and grilled over charcoal to order. We made one big mistake however, we got there after sunset, so we missed that bit, and by then the selection of seafood was fairly limited.
The ethnic dimension of the violence is too distant an issue. The Baluch political parties have protested against the biased operation in Lyari which are targeting their community. They feel betrayed by the government for whom they voted for in the past. Protests have been carried out at various location like Nishter Road, PIB Colony and Malir. Shops were closed, roads were blocked, tires and effigies of PPP leaders were burned. But the Baluch Liberation Army’s (BLA) literature seized from some of Lyari’s gang members tells another story. The police believe BLA is using the help of Lyari gangs for their insurgency operations.
I could not recognize turns on the streets I learned by heart a whole summer I lived in New York. I had to let go, and be led on by the steady stream of people, moving about in a daze like me. We have walked into a city that was pummeled, ripped, and blown in parts; it felt strange.
wouldn't it
After having some rather delicious Octopus balls, we found this place called Hips. It was a huge complex spanning all 11 stories of this building. There was indoor golf, pachinko and I think even bowling and some other fun stuff. We settled on a few games of darts and some beers. This being my first attempt at darts, I was actually quite pleased with my results. It doesn’t mean that I even came close to winning, but it was still fun. Outside of Hips, there was a rock climbing wall. Except, the thing was, it was up about 4 stories and appeared to be able to move up and down. It made me sick just thinking about it, but I bet if it had been open that the boys would have been doing it. Hips also had toilets with heated seats – can I just say…Amazing! I didn’t want to get up because it felt so nice.
We went into the diner and the weirdest thing happened. He went off and sat in a booth all by himself. That’s exactly what a highway killer in a roadside diner would do. He wouldn’t sit with his victim. Right? So, there he sat, looking at me while I ate. Waiting for me to finish…my last meal. I took a drink of my Coke and realized something.
It is in Mr Mugabe's interests to strike a deal before Mr Zuma takes over.
In an attempt to answer critics (including me) who have raised concerns over the commission's transparency, independence and objectivity, he said: ‘We will evaluate all the evidence we hear on a fair basis, judge us at the end by the quality of our report.’
PLEASE be so good as to effect this apology in the terms given within 7 days of today Thursday 24-Feb-2011
Secondly of course we have some killer new bands nowadays but things have changed, there is less budget for the bands in general.
Ultimately, dysfunctional dominant coalitions are like bad marriages. Counseling may help if all parties are committed to a solution. But there are no guarantees.
A 2011 article in Forbes Magazine on-line referenced KFC’s and Chambord’s jump into activities to support Breast Cancer Awareness, and the companies’ lack of authenticity in doing so. Appropriately questioning the intent of KFC and Chambord, Forbes wanted to know what fried chicken and liquor have in common with breast cancer. (See what I mean about the need to choose a cause whereby your target audience understands a clear connection between the cause and your company’s brand?)
Scott breaks into the home of Mayor Stone, and gets the shock of a lifetime when he finds a deadly secret in the cellar. Stone leads a white supremacist group planning to hunt illegal immigrants and terrorize institutions they deem to be a threat to the white race. Too scared to go to the police because of his own criminality, but unwilling to stand by, Scott decides to clean up his act and try to stop the extremists himself.
Writers create characters for the story. Or, the characters that writers create, guide the story.
Sunday morning I woke up early, before the rest of the household stirred, and prepared these little loaves for breakfast. The original recipe for this lovely gluten-free-no-added-sugar-breakfast/snack came from Anja's Food 4 Thought. I changed it up just a bit to accommodate what I had on hand, and these loaves were the serendipitous results. As tasty as they were wholesome, they were a delightful addition to our morning. They disappeared so quickly that next time I'll be sure to double the recipe. Hmmm... Pineapple and macadamia nuts maybe?
Towards the last 10 minutes, pre heat the oven to 140C and once the time is up, place the tray in the middle rack and bake for 12 to 15 minutes. At this point praying to the mac gods for feet would be a great idea (I swear I did this)
Easter is right around the corner and hopefully you'll come join in our challenge fun and get those last minute Easter cards ready and in the mail at the same time! I was running behind a bit this week with being out of town for 5 days attending the workshop at Joan's Gardens but FINALLY got something created last night.
Squeak, clang.
There’s a couple of blogs about Unto Zeor, Forever that pertain to the staying power of Romance over the years, even when you hide it under layers of other genres:
For starters, if this is your favorite blog, then allow me to congratulate you on having exceptional taste. But back to my main point, which is introducing myself. My name is Andrew D. and back in the fall of 2009 I purchased a book entitled, 1001 Movies You Must See Before You Die. I’m sure many of you movie fanatics have seen it and if not, I’m sure you’ve heard of it. After perusing the book for a few days, I decided to put myself through a sort of personal film school and watch all of the movies that the text contained. I knew it was a big task, but I committed myself to seeing the project through to the very end. As I write this, I’m currently 419 films in and am certain that someday I’ll be able to flip through that book, with memories of watching each and every one of the 1001.
On the topic of books, I have to say that lately I have really been getting back into reading tonnes of fiction and it is gezellig overload as I lay on the sofa reading while Pogo sits on belly and purrs. At the moment I am picking up a little obsession for Paul Auster (who I recently wrote about here). After finishing his 'The Book of Illusions' I started on his signature work 'The New York Trilogy'.
In-depth coverage came from the weekly news magazines. There were three major ones: Time, Newsweek and U.S. News & World Report. They sliced and diced the serious stories and few homes were without a subscription to at least one. They covered essentially the same major stories but their analysis varied and you chose your favorite based upon the writing style and photography.
When cases are this easy, it’s a wonderful thing. What do you think?
The ability to…
The three Wheels of Time
It's not always what you wear, but what you stand for that makes the difference! Being smart enough to turn your opponent's slams into a usable symbol is a real talent that some true politicians understand fully!
And last but not least, a pretty simple yet fun project. Hair flowers are all the rage these days and with 3 girls I could use all the hair flowers I can get. The Basic Grey Brads and Buttons make fantastic centers for the flowers.
And do not let the Church cram your Dad’s girlfriend into the pew next to your Mom, where she can’t get pictures and enjoy a good view of her only daughter’s nuptials.
Both teams arrived at their restaurant ready and eager to cooperate for about five minutes before descending into a cesspool of bickering and back-biting. Project manager Jones had her hands full, trying to whip the ladies into some semblance of a business operation.
I wish I could say they were delicious, but I cannot!
I stopped asking, distracted by the automated blood pressure cuff cutting off the circulation in my arm. My hand would curl into a ball while everyone just stared. I took it off, threw it on the floor and explained they would have to take my blood pressure the old fashioned way. (I'm not a good patient.) It was about this time our friendly nurse, Ann, clammed up. She wouldn't even look make eye contact with me.
17. Mackenzie Crook is very enthusiastic about Doctor Who, and they’ve tried to cast him “a million times”, but the dates have never worked out. He was almost cast as Clive in “Rose”.
Blackmail (2005)
Secret Societies
gems or m&m's
love and hugz Heather xox
So that’s the most recent skinny on succulents.
Without further ado . . . here is the desk surface, in our gloriously ugly basement, a.k.a the pit of despair (more on our basement makeover plans in the next couple of weeks too):
The quality of result which we receive depends on the energy we give; if we give positive energy, we will receive positive results back. If you study diligently, your knowledge will expand. If you do good to other people, people will love you. Meanwhile, if you do negative things, you will also receive the same. If you talk badly about people behind their backs, people will trust you less. If you cheat somebody, they will in turn hate you. It also counts as negative if you do good deed but not sincerely.
The next morning set the oven temperature at 190C or 375F and bake the loaves for approximately 30-50 minutes depending on the size and shape of your loaves. I bake mine in double length commercial loaf pans for 50 minutes until the centre bottom of the loaf is hollow when thumped. The tops of this bread are quite dark, if you prefer them less browned cover the loaves with a bit of tin foil after they have achieved the desired colour and continue baking until done.
- As old as Buckley's goat (I don't know who Buckly is, or how old his goat was)
I know several people are sick and tired of hearing about this theory but I think it would be a great bad ending for those who do not procure enough war assets and choose the control ending. Imagine you control the Reapers you see a relatively happy end…only to come back to reality to see Shepard kill his remaining squadmates, even your love interest if you want to make it worse. Then – of course – ascending and aiding in the creation of yet another Reaper. And so the cycle continues. Admittedly it’s depressing but it would certainly add more variety on top of everything else.
Later we went for a family meal at The Buccanner , I started with a pint of Felinfoel Double Dragon smooth and malty, a little spicy, its not an outstanding bitter but hits the spot. As I then received an insane pile of Pembrokshire ribs (reminded me a bit of TV's Man vs Food, but on this occasion man wins!) I followed them some how with a pint of Doom Bar, better condition this time, seemed lighter, noticable hops balanced its malt, good pint. A busy pub, serving standard but pretty good food, the only thing I didn't like was they ice chill their glasses, fine for those drinking cider or lager but not mine please! Seriously, some guy had ice crystals on the rim of his Strongbow!
Annie: “Werewolf.”
‘Cameron takes Feldman to all his donor meetings,’ said one senior Tory.
An inexact, subjective art form, to be sure, but here is a good article for picking fonts for your publication. Some page designers, including many at decent-sized newspapers (ahem, Telegram), give little thought to keeping their look modern, much less arranging the fonts in a way that is appealing.
The success of the NordicTrack inspired numerous other designs. In 1980, just a few years after Pauls received his patent, the USPTO issued just 179 patents for exercise machines (Class 482). By the end of the 1990s the USPTO was issuing more than 350 patents for exercise machines per year. In 2010, the USPTO issued 736 patents for exercise devices. The top patent owners include Nautilus, Icon IP and Brunswick Corporation.
140 lbs from my highest weight ever. 128 since beginning the pre-op diet. 118 since the day of surgery.
The proper words don’t sound right though;
That is all everyone and I will be back with you tomorrow.
Diet Cherry Pepsi - yum! :)
The writer is a former Umno state assemblyman and a FMT columnist.
All you do is modify the array I have, pop it into a link, bookmark it, and you have the ability to see any page on your web site in all environments.
This month's color is Green in honor of St. Patrick's Day! After you're done hopping around today, make sure you play along with this month's Green challenge (click here for details) for a chance to win some awesome SP and Company prizes!
Turn dough onto floured surface, knead by hand for 5 minutes.
6. Exploding lipstick.
That’s because the phone, which retails online for $79.99 with a two-year contract, sports a four-row QWERTY keyboard complete with navigational arrows and shortcut keys.
The Witter Bynner Foundation for Poetry (http://www.bynnerfoundation.org/) endorses grants through nonprofit organizations, particularly as seed money, in support of individual poets, poetry translation and the process of translation, developing poetry audiences, and the uses of poetry.
Sloan stepped from the kitchen, drying a glass mug with a bleached white dish towel. He stood in the doorway in a pair of faded jeans that left nothing to the imagination and a faded tight fit t-shirt. He smiled at the sight of her.
We will continue to read about these early kings and what we could learn from them.
But maybe, just maybe, putting baby right smack in the middle of your life is okay. If you're like me and (secretly) do it too, you shouldn't make that one more thing to feel guilty about. Just enjoy the moment with your child(ren) and let things happen. So long as they have a happy mom, that's what they'll remember.
...to my long-awaited Christmas break :(
The name of their 1934 song “Rock and Roll” is an early use of the term. It is not one of their hotter numbers; it refers to “the rolling rocking rhythm of the sea”.
I think the professional is personal and my communication online reflects this. I think about what I do / professional issues a fair bit and this comes out. Twitter encourages the blurring of the line but I share considerably less there than I might with colleagues in the office. I also like to show off pictures of pies.
uploaded 10 Dec 2001
The part I've already written always sounds pretty good (at least, before editing) and the part I'm trying to work on doesn't seem like it's even worth writing down. Maybe this is self-doubt creeping in, or some kind of writing perfectionism. Do you have this problem? Some ways to deal with it:
Head Circumference: 14 in (17%)
Dies - Spellbinders - Fleur De Lis Rectangles, Classic Rectangles Large; Stampin' Up - Sizzix Embosslits Sweetest Stem
Date: October 24, 2011
Oops! One rejection and from a facebook friend I didn't realize until I saw the name again. Curious they wrote "nothing here to buy which interests me"...a curious rejection. Not painful. A funny thought, what if the disability journal rejects me. I'm not even good enough to be broken...kidding!
6. Using a mop or rotary floor machine and the stripping pad, continue the stripping operation by infilling and overlapping passes.
Antiseen / Hellstomper - Keep it Flying split (white vinyl. Wrestling cover)
As we ventured through the castle we discovered an area with a sword in a stone, for me, this was one of the best parts of the trip. While we were there a beautiful yellow and black butterfly fluttered around us and then kindly, as if it knew all about my obsession with butterflies, rested by my foot for a good five minutes allowing me to take some beautiful pictures of it.
Loving: Prepare yourself...this is slightly (okay very) embarrassing to admit, but while I was sick I got into watching a new television series on Netflix. It's called Make It Or Break It, and it's basically a teen-geared gymnastics drama centered around a group of elite, Olympic bound gymnasts in Boulder, Colorado. It's an ABC Family show and I absolutely LOVE it. It's terribly cheesy and pretty ridiculous at times, but I can't stop watching it and have really gotten into all of the characters. I love Payson, adore Damon, and really think Summer and Sasha should be together! I haven't met one person who has ever even seen it though, so if you have, say hello! I feel so alone out here on my bad-television branch...even though I really don't think this show is bad at all. I'm finishing up Season 2 in preparation for Season 3 to begin next week and any free chance I get I'm trying to fit in yet another episode.
Sure, Twitter might seem detrimental to writers, by dint of being a colossal, neverending Procrastination Circus From Hell. This social network can indeed be extremely distracting, but like pretty much everything in life, it depends how you ration it out. We writers have always been highly skilled at finding displacement activities. Twitter is merely the new aiming-paper-balls-at-a-bin-across-your-study.
Then we see Julia going up to the attic to fantasize about the one time she had sex with Larry’s brother Frank, who was the guy from the opening. Yup, the movie’s focal character is a lady who continually fantasizes about screwing her husband’s brother – isn’t that just charming? I don’t even think it was an ongoing affair – the movie makes it seem like it was just one time that they had sex, and she just never got over it. What a sad sap.
But I wanted to know what they say is the true source of this storyline, other than Grimm's Fairy Tales? There seems to be nothing there on the internet - the script is attributed to Julia Leigh, the director. There's no mention of it being adapted from any other source...
This morning, to sop up everyone’s alcohol-filled bellies, Lionel brought in bags of croissants, pain au chocolat and pain au raisin (which is quickly becoming one of my favorites… when you get a warm pain au raisin, as this morning’s was, there’s nothing much better). Everyone is rolling in late and giggling about the night.
32. Boys respect everything and everyone including GIRLS! (**that’s the hope!)
Seems, a name says more
However, both clubs are acutely aware that there will be tension should Emmanuel Adebayor recover his fitness in time. Rightly they are appealing to fans to take responsibility and end the racist element of the chanting. Hopefully the clubs will acknowledge that neither set of supporters are angels with Tottenham equally as capable of such chants as they have proven in recent seasons. As Johnny Rotten said, “No-one is innocent“.
That might be excused as the act of a man having a political near death experience, but it seems that it’s the new reality in Conservative messaging.
If Rajma remains uncooked even after cooking for long then you can try adding soda to it when soaked on previous night.
And then, as usual, I just made something up as I went along.
"What do you want to drink?"
never knew sweat could weigh so much
Dozens of Ford employees were relocated to Brazil, and a model American town was built in the jungle, complete with a modern hospital, a library, a golf course, and rows of white bungalows. The streets were dotted with Model T Ford automobiles. Henry Ford exported small town America to the jungle.
The first painting sold that night was that large image of the LA 31 label. A couple walked in, sampled some beer while admiring the painting. They purchased it before I could get a bid in (I was moving slow as I had consumed a bit of wine, beer and Gin & juice myself). That painting would have looked good in our office.
We have the whole young people and alcohol debate so sullied by poor representation in the media. It also has to be said that social atomisation in the UK, with fewer families than ever sitting down together for meals or enjoying inter-generational nights out, has reduced the number of opportunities to mentor teens into the ways of the drop.
The 80's references are everywhere, since the whole idea of the contest in the book focuses on the 80's but the author has either done his homework very well or was in fact a geek boi himself. I'm guessing it's the latter and he probably still is. I'm still a big game geek at heart too. I'm a high 100+ lvl warrior on a popular MMORPG which I've played for almost 6 years now and not ashamed to admit it...well, not here anyway :D
And he's up here like this, and you are all down there.
Seal said none of the guns in the operation were allowed to enter Mexico so they could be traced to cartel leaders, a tactic that has led to widespread criticism of the Justice Department’s actions in the “Fast and Furious” gun-walking sting in Arizona.
Most of this stuff could have been cleared up if open communication were ever utilized. You’d be amazed how much understanding can occur when people genuinely talk to and listen to one another. But, not happening, so here goes.
This week, whether you are student or teacher, take one small action step along your path.
In it the author refers to the Arabians not as Muslims but as “Hagarians” (mhaggraye) — that is, the people of Hagar, Abraham’s concubine and the mother of Ishmael. The Arabic interlocutor denies the divinity of Christ, in accord with Islamic teaching, but neither side makes any mention of the Qur’an, Islam, or Muhammad.“
- 65 g dark chocolate
Angry Birds Fans around the world have so far played a total of 200,000 years of Angry Birds, with 300 million minutes of playing time daily. Moreover, more than 266 billion levels of Angry Birds have been played, with 400 billion birds launched into action, and over 44 billion Stars collected in the process.
This is a very beautiful, courageous woman writing about surviving abuse, feeling its effects, and, the process of healing. She is candid, honest, strong, and inspiring. I always consider it a sacred thing when someone else shares their life story and pain.
And blowing wind,rain and thunder loud.
I love you Carrie Bradshaw. I really do.
One thing we learned a while back was to NOT go to Hollywood Studios on a day they were showing Fantasmic. It's only shown twice a week (usually), so when it is shown, guests flock to the park. We are not huge fans of the show and usually skip it, but many other people love it. A busy park is not really fantastic for us. It means we have to wait longer for our favorite attractions.
The same Empire our students hate with a perfect hate.
3 occurred
The complete Battlestar Galactica (the re-imagined version) *favourite*
"Because you weren't born yet."
Do I regret about anything??? Not really. I would only regret of my actions that have hurt people, but my actions that ended up hurting myself…well, I don’t regret of the, because I was awared of the (poor) choises I was making. And honestly, so far, it has been a very awesome road. Tho, Storm says someday I will wake up on ice with no kidneys ))))))),
I wanted to know who El Toro was. I began my search through the annual, trying to match up handwriting. Men of that era must have all taken the same handwriting course because so many signatures were remarkably similar. I narrowed it down to a few, but had no other leads.
This morning I have been thinking about what it means to practice the presence of a God who is love. We know that the central commandment Jesus gave to the disciples was to ‘love the Lord your God with all your heart and mind and soul and to love your neighbour as yourself’. It is so simple yet so profound that we spend our entire lives trying to understand and live into its meaning.
If he exists or dies, there’s no difference,
23. When she learns to give kisses, she will want to plant them all over your face. Encourage this practice.
“A bit cheeky perhaps,” I replied. “But we can’t punish them for admiring your lingerie.”
It turns out that Violet has something called CL (Caseous Lymphadenitis) which is the bane of the goat and sheep world -- a chronic diesease that affects approximately 30% of all flocks world wide. It can be treated (doing just what we did) and is harmless to people. That said, NO, we are not drinking the milk until Violet heals up. It is painful to pour a gallon of fresh milk down the drain each day, but we feel safer doing it. Hoping it will only be a week or two before Violet is feeling 100% and we can return to cheesemaking! Signing off -- a squeemish, no-longer, vet wanna-be
2. A new window will open. You can choose to download or play the file.
OK, I’ll start by answering some questions…
His relative Graham Peck said: “When Bagsy read that Cheryl was planning on ringing her mystery soldier, he panicked because he’s not allowed to have his phone on for another nine days – it’s military rules. He wants her to know that he’ll be in touch the moment he lands, and wants her to wait for him. Andy’s a great guy and keeps himself fit in the gym.”
Eileen xx
Quick Fixes, it was announced today by Thomas J. Wallace, editorial director at Condé Nast.
So needless to say, my budget is limited for making it my own.
before i get too old (and forgetful),
… feeling like a fucking idiot. I feel so stupid that everytime my mind has a minute spare from the task at hand, or from my glorious little boy – I’m still thinking about him.
1. peel and cut the apples and pears in BIG chunks, like 1 inch pieces (so it doesn't cook down into applesauce! One problem solved).
- sentiment, also by Elzybells, stamped using SU 'Real Red'
I make my wood thinner. Unfortunately I don't have a bandsaw, which is the proper tool for the job, so I use my table saw. First I cut the second edge parallel to the first, as wide as I can get the board, in most cases around 5 1/2". Now there is one smooth face and two smooth perpendicular edges.
Back when I was a lad, the only source of information a young person had was his father or the local newspaper and both were staunchly conservative, prone to bias, and largely focussed on sport.
In 2012, CEOs face rising uncertainty in the global economy, as developed economies struggle to sustain recoveries. We found a growing sense of preparedness and a surprising optimism: chief executives were nearly three times as confident of their companies’ growth this coming year as they were in the global economy’s growth.
Now, if you new to the platform and lack "geek" knowledge, we suggest you visit the site tumblring.net, which basically focuses on Tumblr Tips, Tutorials and Guides to provide you with a quick solution when trying to customize your site within Tumblr.
2010.09.01 Afghanistan Helmand 0 15 Fifteen people at a market are badly injured, many with limbs torn from their bodies, by a Taliban blast.
This isn't perfect; about half the tracks might be rejected by a label for inclusion on any box set (as presented here that is) due to flaws in the original transfer (basically, sibilance and some slight inner grove distortion on the tracks that ended each side of the double vinyl set). I was able to compensate and correct for most of this, but it's not perfect, and I don't expect to ever get it perfect until someone leaks the CDs these were obviously taken from.
* 1 shallot, minced (I omitted)
Here is US government claiming it can Constitutionally control-drown (waterboard) anyone they declare a “terrorist” as a 1% terror-tactic to silence Americans.
So, the point of this whole post. Yes, there is a point.
After a visit to Akbar’s burial chamber, and with the prayer still echoing, I take a walk around the premises. There are hardly any tourists and the wide, arched passageways that run on all four sides of the Mausoleum are empty and peaceful. Some of the arches are covered with screens, while many of them are not leading to sunlight creating some beautiful patterns and light and shadow effects on the floors and walls. I spend quite some time delighting in this play of light.
In this book, Hjortsberg is ‘padding out’ the reality that magician Harry Houdini formed an unlikely friendship with Sherlock Holmes author, Sir Arthur Conan Doyle, and that they eventually fell out over matters supernatural. Houdini obviously knowing that all of his tricks were just that and being a renowned sceptic, with Conan Doyle being a firm supporter of ‘the unknown’ – and in 1918 believing Houdini had really been able to dematerialise an elephant, even though he protested to the contrary.
“Now what?” Terry said.
Wish me luck my dear friends... I hope I can continue to be determine, and save much more in future. Every month, I am only 'rich' for 5 minutes when the salary came in, and after all the payments to all, I end up eating my savings instead.. so, I better save fast, and not letting my savings eating up in no time. I shall share further in my post on how from a rich beginning month, and I end up poor in 5 minutes...
Before the tour, we had dinner at the Boilerhouse Restaurant. Al Fresco since the weather was lovely, cool but clement and made even more delightful when a possum decided to clamour on his leg for food. Very nice Aussie experience and I swear the thing would have jumped in his lap if I hadn't been so eager to grab the camera . . .alas, the little marsupial took off, armed with Jeff's bread roll! One observation, Americans use cutlery differently to us and I have been labelled a tight arse for not tipping. Folks, we only tip in Australia if the service is exemplary. It's not expected. He's still giving me shit for not tipping.
